[Verse 1: Canibus]
I think fast, switch fast, quick fast, quick as
Immigrants say, ‘No habla ingles', at border-patrol fences
Messing with Canibus is senseless
Divide my senses by six and you'll end up with triple sixes
And triple the digits mean triple the spirits
My light body to the third power will triple my lyrics
I'm triple the threat, I'm triple my physical flesh
I'm telling you, put your money on me then triple your bet
‘Cause I won't be satisfied till I'm set
Till I got a triplex out in Tribeca with the skyline effect
Rhyming is the nine-to-five that I manipulate best
Eight hours of writing and memorizing a manuscript
Called "The Biography of Canibus"
Subtitled ‘The Ultimate Guide for Teaching Modern Man How to Spit'
How to tongue twist, how to enunciate certain shit
How to control your breath, how to make your syllables spit
You niggas ain't listen to Bis, I kill ‘em with shit
I'm wicked with this, I should be selling tickets to this
Paparazzi should probably be taking pictures of this
My fans in the street with signs tryna picket for this
Saying, "We want ‘Bis! We want ‘Bis!
We want the rapper with the illest lyrics!"
My dedication and my commitment's beginning-less
I can go four quarters or nine innings for this
Go twelve rounds, play two days of cricket for this
Lead crusades across Europe like the Christians for this
The notion I'm dedicated is an understatement
My rhymes are out of this world like the Russian space-station
Sneak-attack rappers, grab them and slash them
Chop their heads off with claws sharper than velociraptors
Hunt them like Jurassic Park actors
But spare Samuel Jackson's life ‘cause he was the only black one
Action packed like Shaft, the black assassin
Blasting the .753 backwards Magnum
Follow me down the road to Damascus
Do not follow these madmen, popping ecstasy pills like aspirin
I and I come fe manifest the most high
Drink a gallon of cyanide and still can not die
Niggas want to lock the ‘Chronicles of Canibus' away forever
And put my book of rhymes through a shredder
Never, I'm way too clever the way I manoeuvre
Beat your ass like Lennox Lewis did to David Tua
In front of a hundred-million pay-per-viewers your career is ruined
Your face will be swollen like the Benihana Buddha
Bring it to ya, prove you're a loser
Beyond the length of this rhyme you have no future
Pounce upon you like a puma or some wild cougars
In the jungle with my adrenaline juices flowing through 'em
I'ma reprogram everything that you're doing
Hypnotize the audience you perform in front of to start booing
You're stupid, you and your whole crew are extremely foolish
I can't cipher with you ‘cause your breath is too putrid
Put your mic down and step away from it
Shut your motherfucking mouth and don't say nothing
You have the right to remain silent
Sentenced to life on Rikers Island for terrible freestyling

[Verse 2: Canibus]
I heard a rumour English women make love the best
Is that true? ‘Cause I ain't had no justice yet
A lot of clowns keep arguing on who the best is
Bite the style but can't digest it
Till they get karate kicked in the mouth and their teeth get ejected
Told you to watch who you beef with on the last record
Platinum teeth? I sell them for a thousand pounds a piece
You buy one back and you get one free
Put it down in the east, put it down in the west
Put it down on paper, put the paper down on the desk
In the studio is where I put it down to the test
It's nothing but skull-crushing pressure down at them depths
Throw a rough mix down, download it to disk
Give a copy to everybody that's down with Bis
Since '96, the Dogg Pound Remix
First time anybody put me down to spit
It's like Pakman don't stop
Till I hear my voice banging up and down the block in a Magnavox
With a hundred watts, creating ripples in the water like aquanauts
Breathing through their oxygen-box
I belong on top of the pops not on the bottom with rocks
I mean, honest to God, I'm shocked, I thought the album was hot
I guess you can't write an infinite rhyme with a finite mind
That's why rhymes like mine mystify mankind
A lot of rappers are ahead of their time
But when it comes to rhymes like mine the word ‘time' doesn't apply
You see, rhyming is the art
The microphone is the paintbrush responsible for getting the point across
The canvas is the street
Where the Master of the Ceremony paints the picture for everybody to see
Nobody could rhyme this fluent, nobody ever did what I'm doing
Nobody ever spit what I'm spewing
I'm the illest alive and I'ma prove it
Plus I've got to show the people that I've got mad love for Rap music
I bury MCs with rosary beads
A picture of their wife and their seeds and a picture of me
I'm as graceful as the left hand of Rembrandt
Put some instrumentals on and ask my pen to dance
I'm such a gentleman, pull out chairs, open doors, never offend my fans
Unless they offend me and I lose my temper, man[Intro: Mike Tyson]
Yo Canibus man, what's up man?
I caught you on that cut with Wyclef man - you were booming
But I caught these foul slouch-ass niggas, you know mean?
Talking foul about you the other night
On the corner of the boulevard man - I wasn't with that
But I ain't know you well enough to defend you though right?
But you seem like you got true game
But peep game man, they've been playing me all my life man
You know I won the title a couple of times, dig right
You know what I mean?
But they can't hurt us man, we going to do it
Get up in this ring man put on these gloves
Let me show how to handle yourself man
You don't got nobody out there with you
I gots to show you man, get up in there move that head man
Come on to me man, but when you come, man
You gotta come for blood man
Come up to me man, come on bust that nigga whole man
Niggas talking that shit about you..
Hey Mike Tyson here speaking with the Canibus man over here
Yo Canibus your main objective out here is to do nothing but
Eat, eat, eat, eat, MC's for lunch, breakfast
Hey man they been playing me all my life man
You know I won the title a couple of times, dig right?
No, but they can't hurt us, man
We gonna do it, get up in this ring man, put on these gloves
Let me show you how to handle yourself, man

[Verse 1: Canibus]
So I'ma let the world know the truth, you don't want me to shine
You studied my rhyme, then you laid your vocals after mine
That's a bitch move, something that a homo rapper would do
So when you say that you platinum, you only dropping clues
I studied your background, read the book that you wrote
Researched your footnotes about how you used to sniff coke
Fronting like a drug-free role model, you disgust me
I know bitches that seen you smoke weed recently
You walk around showing off your body because it sells
Plus to avoid the fact that you ain't got skills
Mad at me because I kick that shit real niggas feel
While 99% of your fans wear high heels
From Ice-T to Kool Moe Dee to Jay-Z
Now you want to fuck with me? You must be crazy
You dripping with wack juice, and you can't get it off
You better be prepared to finish what you start, nigga

[Interlude: Mike Tyson]
Yo Canibus, man, you gotta hit harder than that man
You don't want no bitch-ass niggas hanging out with me, man
We're warriors man, when we go into battle
We come out or don't come out at all

[Verse 2: Canibus]
You better give me the respect that I deserve or I'm a take it by force
Blast you with a 45 colt, make you somersault
Shock you with a couple hundred thousand volt thunderbolts
Before you wanted a war, now you want to talk
It's about who strikes the hardest, not who strikes first
That's why I laugh when I hear that wack ass verse
That shit was the worst rhyme I ever heard in my life
Cause the greatest rapper of all time died on March 9th
God bless his soul rest in peace kid
It's because of him now at least I know what beef is
It's not what I would call this, see this is something different
A faggot nigga tryna make a living off of dissing
Somebody that he gotta know is better than him
But he feeling himself because he got more cheddar than him
Well let me tell you something: you might got more cash then me
But you ain't got the skills to eat a nigga's ass like me
And if you really want to show off, we can get it on
Live in front of the cameras on your own sitcom
I'll let you kick a verse..fuck it, I'll let you kick them all
I'll even wait for the studio audience to applaud
Now watch me rip the tat from your arm
Kick you in the groin, stick you for your Vanguard award
In front of your mom, your 1st, 2nd and 3rd-born
Make your wife get on the horn, call Minister Farrakhan
So he could persuade me to squash it, I say "Naw, he started it
He forgot what a hardcore artist is"
A hardcore artist is a dangerous man, such as myself
Trained to run 20 miles in soft sand
On or off land, programmed to kick hundreds of bars offhand
From a lost and forgotten land. You done did it, man
You done spitted some wack shit
And probably thought that because it's been a minute I'll forget it?
Fuck that! Because like Common and Cube, I see the bitch in you
And I'ma make the world see it too, motherfucker

[Referee]
Ladies and gentlemen, we have a new lyrical weight champion
By second round knock out, 3 minutes and 40 seconds, Can-i-bus

[Outro: Mike Tyson]
Yo Canibus man, you moving like Mike Tyson Jr. man
You in-and-out and you're agile with your flow man
But dig right, you got you got to eat man, that's your name Canibus
Your whole agenda is to eat these niggas man
They have no business to be in the same stage with you
Holding the mic with you
But dig right

Hey Mike Tyson here speaking with the Canibus man over here
Yo Canibus your main objective out here is to do nothing but
Eat, eat, eat, eat MC's for lunch, breakfast, dinner
That's your agenda baby
Your your agenda to to consume them
Their whole existence, they can't exist in your presence
The Canibus is here to rule forever
Mike Tyson, on the def[Round 1: Canibus]
Those look like Tom Cruise mom's shoes
Soaked in some nasty ass wanton soup
You bout to lose, what you got to prove?
Yeah, who you gon rap circles around?
Turn around, cause you ain't allowed to worship the crown
You look like a dead bird on the ground
With ya bones exposed, this is ya funeral services now
This is ya death Diz, pour it out, pass it around
I laugh at ya style, the wise owl laughs at the crowd
Pound for pound? I clip ya wings, lift your ass off the ground
Throw you in the air, crash you in the clouds!
Slaughterhouse? What the fuck is you talking about?
I brought enough rhymes to snuff all four of them out
I bet you hang out with Elton John in Lebanon
When Eminem's gone, so both of yall can make feminine bars!
You must be smokin', hopin an opium pipe,if you think you gon' win tonight
Yea right, these people came to see a fight!
I'mma fuck you up in this battle royale, yea dawg
I'mma make you not wanna ever rap no more
Cuz you cheatin!
You know you in agreement with demons, you suckin semen!
You really think that's air that you breathin?
You dirty fucking scumbag trashbag of scum
You look like a vampire that drinks faggot blood
And you gonna catch that fade, baby
The streets is watching like Jay-Z
I squeeze ya IV till you sit up and face me!
You crazy, ya egk beepin' like you lazy
Fuck you, pay me, or donate it to Haiti
To be here today, I had to hypnotize myself
But it's impossible to lie to myself
Look at him! It's like I'm standing beside myself
He bit my whole fucking style
I got MMA niggas in the crowd, I should make them whoop yo ass right now
Ayo hood niggas! Whats good nigga?
Wing nuts, battle you in the woods around trees and ninjas
Battle rap 20 degrees colder in the winter
In the summer I'm sizzler, roll you up like rizzlers
Toss you a thousand bars nigga, tell you to bench it
Then I battle you again, just to see if you meant it
Look at the people on the rooftop, the people on the fences
You came here healthy, you gon leave here injured
Real gladiators gotta bleed in the trenches
Go ahead Diz, do your famous Slim Shady impression
Bring 5'9 in the session, I teach all 3 of you a lesson
I spit real rap shit, you spit pop shit, no question
Dizaster and his fans a bunch of bitches
You know I'm hardcore, I showed up with stitches!
C'mon Diz, now you know you in over ya head
When there's people in the crowd that memorize battle rhymes I said
I'll battle you in the flesh, I'll battle you on the net
I'll battle you over the phone, you can call me collect
I'll battle you for respect
I'll battle you over a blank check
I'll battle you with a gun to my neck
I'll battle you over the toilet with my dick out
I'll battle you juggling a hand grenade with the pin out
In a stolen car with the VIN number ripped out
Drinking a Guiness Stout
Doing a 360 spinout
You already know, I look like Riddick, out the slam
You a Arabic Peter Pan lookin' out for the clan
C'mon fam, you know the big bad wolf eat the lamb
I'm a tiger with infinite stripes, you Tucan Sam
Damn! You know cocaine's a hell of a drug
Made this dumbfuck wanna battle Can-I-Bus
I told this nigga! I'm takin' yo ass to Disneyland
I'mma piss in ya mouth, while you shittin' your pants
And while the lyrics enhanced, my fans gonna shit on your fans!
I'm glad you a battle thug
The big bad wolf gonna drink a glass of your blood
I'll use your skin for a fuckin' prayer rug!
I'll destroy you, I hated you the first time I saw you
Mothafuckas like you get buried for being loyal
I'm ashamed of Hip-Hop for even praising you
You don't exist before Youtube cuz you ain't really paid no dues
You make me sick!
You get respect for saying stupid shit
Ya fans are clueluess, they think you got juice & shit
Everytime you in Atlanta, Eddy Long is your pastor
You a rug trader traitor, a fake gold jewlery chain maker
A slum dog millionaire's neighbor
I'm a Jamaican assasin, You a Dizaster waitin' to happen
You couldn't fight your way out of a wet paper napkin
I jumped out my momma pussy, you fell out ya mother booty all wiggly
Covered in humus, all filthy
Yo I'mma let the world know the truth, you don't want me to shine
You study my rhymes, then you laid your vocals after mine
That's a bitch move, something that Dizaster would do
You say you the best battler in the world? You ain't telling the truth!
You studied my background, ain't no book that I wrote
Ain't no footnotes, ya style is one big joke
From DNA, to Arsonal, to KOTD
Now you wanna fuck wit me? You must be crazy
I'm a apex predator, you a battle rap degenerate
Tryna gain leverage from a high fructose beverage

#

[Round 1: Dizaster]
Yo, whatever ya'll expecting from me? Today think the reversal of that
Today every single verse that I rap is gonna have zero personal attacks
I'mma use the science and math and shit that you teachin', and I'mma murk you with that
No personals, no jokes, just lyricism cuz Hip-Hop has always been like that
So anything he says to me intellectual, I'mma be able to flip right back
I can teach ya'll how to chemically break down an enzyme flat
Stabilize the temperature using incubators which condense molecules that turns into H2O you can get right back
Cuz when particles...wait a minute, ya'll thought I was gonna come out here and spit some stupid shit like that?!
Ayo, let me get this fuckin' word off
Fuckin' faggot brought all of his homies with him..he hasn't even got his verse off and this little fucking homo already got his shirt off
You wanna shit the (something), you get killed and (something else)
You fucking pussy, you probably paint your pinky nails and chill with him at Chippendale's
Welcome to hell Germaine, the wrath is coming
This is the part of the rap you get your ass confronted
Then I catch you in the back gettin' relaxed & blunted
& set the place on fire til it feels like you sittin' inside of a dragon's stomach
You cats don't want it, you get castrated and hacked in nuggets
I make chicken strips outta ya loved ones, that's what I call a family bucket
I'm like KFC when I pull the axe out, you get slashed & gutted
So fast, even the King Of the Dot staff will need panoramic camera coverage
Just to capture the angles of blood back from the other side of the room when I drag you from it
Fuckin' yellin over my shit like they always do
That's some shit I already knew
But what's wrong with you Canibus? What is it you fucked it up doing some skateboarding stuff?
I'm trying to figure out how you ended up with your bones getting crunched
But now it makes sense, I get it, you punched yourself in the chest so hard you made your own shoulders touch!
You had a fall from grace, fell a long way from the praise that he's gotten
To being straight misplaced and forgotten
Nowadays from place to place he be hoppin'
But he never feels safe, no matter where. from all the names he be droppin'
& he keeps droppin' names even after all the pain that it cost him
He stays takin' losses, LL Cool J basically stomped him
The same happened to Slim Shady, even though you initiated the problem
So it's safe to say after today, this'll be the nail in his coffin
I got infinite skill... even if you took millions and millions of pills
Like the kid from the film Limitless you still couldn't think of shit that's this ill
I'm Ill, ridiculous, chill
You physically built like a little bitch ya squad trippin'? Then they all gettin' killed!
Ya dogs? I'm skinning them, knitting them into a sweater quicker than Cruela Deville
Looks at this fuckin' treatment I'm givin 'em
Look at the treatment I'm givin this old ass senior citizen
That wouldn't be seen within the reach of 300 ft of the streets of Michigan
From all the nightmares and dreams of Slim repeatedly ripping him
I ain't Peter Griffin, so why do I beef with this chicken?
Jabbin' and kickin repeatedly until he bleeds from his ribs and then falls asleep on the concrete in the same fetal position
He was left in ever since Eminem beat his career in submission & didn't let him spit again
Blackballed, and restricted him
Blocked him from his mission or any other business attempts, so techically Slim ended up stiffin' 'em
Harder than he did to Kim ever since the last time the bitch attempted taking half of his shit from him
You a pitiful guy, miserable type sucker. You lived in a time cluster
Where it was easy for getting by 'cuz most of the industry lines were missing those intricate rhyme structures
So your lyrics to them were like mind fuckers!
But as the internet winds, buffered, you realized it's harder to keep up with these little guys 'cuz it's like a million times tougher
I mean, looking at him I feel like the universe just wants to witness this guy suffer
Cuz he's going through hell, and LL's out in some ridiculous-priced suburb
He probably lives with a white butler who every night, is hired to fix him a nice supper
He literally drives, like 65 hummers, and every one of them is specifcally a different type of color
Yo, ya'll know what rhymes with Germaine Williams?
That's what it is! Never made millions!
That dude, I don't know who he is but he's straight brilliant!
So, what happend after your successive second round knock out?
Exactly! Nothing happened! There was no one left on Earth for Canibus to call out so he pretty much ran outta things to talk about
The industry blocked him out, and they fuckin' locked him out
And we didn't hear from him again 'till he popped up in a song calling out every single member of Slaughterhouse
You would've socked every one of them out?
Pfft, don't be mad at them because you took the hater/salty route
Mothafucka, everybody hates you guts, you called out every member of Slaugterhouse
Except Crooked I 'cuz Crooked I would've stomped you out
Bro, everybody fuckin' hates you, what the fuck are you talking 'bout?
We interviewed LL and even his own mama said to knock you out!
Look at the bright side, you're like a certified author now
You can write a novel on what being blackballed is all about
It's probably all them callouts and them blogs, and why he had a fallin out
It's like being inside of a poolhall, when watchin his ass fall cuz he got ate/eight, blackballed and then they chalked him out!
Fuck are you talking 'bout? He wants to rap with me
We all miss that Canibus that used to attack with the thirst, rage
Snap and burst like an animal that's trapped in a dirt cage
But nowadays you uninspired and I can see the cracks in your wordplay
You're saying "aww I kept it true to hiphop blahblahblahblah", that's what the herbs say
You took your ball home and went home 'cuz things in the industry weren't happening your way
You wanted to become famous too, You & LL were suppose to collab on the first tape
But he bodybagged you off the track in the worst way
Then you came back and said "it wasn't about the fame, it's about being heard and there's a purpose to every actual verse made"
But that's the impact the accurate words make
Cuz if it was truly about the art, and the lab was your workplace
Then you would've never wanted to be on a track like that in the first place!
I fuckin' hate it when people try to go mainstream, and then flip-flop
And then they try to disguise their failure as them being true to hiphop!
So I don't give a fuck what you got to talk about
Next time one of your homies pops out, that's how you do a fuckin first round knockout!

.
.

[Round 2: Canibus]
You fucking Iranian shoe-bombing, Islamic Math Hoffin'
Jewish Bronze Solomon, in Jesus Christ name Amen!
..Separated shoulder, crawlin' outta border control
I ain't have enough quarters for the toll
$300 dollar bounty, it took 10 days before I got out the country
They was fightin' all around me, this is how they found me
I came here to do you worse than DNA did
I wanted it to be no more wins for you in this battle rap biz
I wanted to eat ya fuckin' heart, two chambers at a time
'Cuz maybe after that you'll understand the danger of the rhyme
Gravity is a repulsion, not an attraction
When it comes to lyrics, I used to be the living Bruce Lee in action
Counter-psychological measures reduce the pressure
Who's better? That mothafucka? Never!
It's gonna take more than him, to make Can-I-Bus a believer
Man, I thought you was gonna walk out with Justin Bieber
I never met a battler that act like Stan so much
He wanna be Marshall so bad, he put up bread to battle Can-I-Bus
Tell 'em! You hang out with Elton John, in Lebanon
When Eminem's gone, so both of ya'll can massage RuPaul's balls
Are you a faggot? Or a faggot magnet?
Why the fuck are you so obsessed with eatin' rappers' asses??
What are you Dizaster? Are you an Iranian monkey trainer? A middle-eastern gospel country singer?
Or a hot urine-drinkin', camel-kissing sand nigga?
Is that a urostomy bag? C'mere, lemme talk to you man
Somebody strip search this terrorist fag!
That's right, I smell the fear, somewhere in here, and up there
I seen the piss running down the stairs
I bet you in ya whole life, you never even cleaned one weapon
You play Call of Duty and do Scarface impressions
Chill bedrin, real G's come out to see the legends
Nobody gives a shit about the honorable mentions
If I catch him levitatin', I'm devastatin'
I'll shave 'em & suffocate 'em, then bring 'em back to life to interrogate him!
You fuckin' Pagan! What I told you about meditatin'?
What the fuck is a Canadian Arabian?
I'm Rip the Jacker! The white chapel black battler
Say it faster, Dizaster is a punchline ameteur
You can't even ride a beat! Get yo bitchass off the street
Yo bitchass should be across the street
Talk is cheap, until a lyrical metal jacket lift you off ya feet
I been the goddamn acapella chief all week!
When I'm done wit you, you gon be rappin' in China
Somewhere wit no runnin water, battlin' minors
Wit Fresh Coast tonighters & a fresh slice of Fresh Coast hepatitis
You a pedophile that bites vaginas!
In a dark room eatin mosquitos, flies, and spiders
Bout to get waterboarded, hooked up to two wires
The crowd say "ooh", the crowd say "ahh"
Unlimited rounds, you must be in the mood to die!
Mema-se mama-sa mama-makusa
I put a tattoo of you, on Treach's arm right next to 2Pac

#

[Round 2: Dizaster]
Metal jackets, you pathetic faggot
I will stomp you to death
I'm a fuckin' hustler, so when I be callin people, you know, I call to collect
But when Canibus be calling people, you know he be callin' collect
See,you wanna talk the talk out here, just deposit the check
Cuz if not?? I'm gonna fuckin stomp you to death
See out in the east you can talk that talk, but if you talk that talk in the west?
You leave like Flava Flav, just another skinny little black faggot gettin clocked in his chest!
Then he said I'm like Slim Shady! I'm tryna be Slim Shady, just for saying that you're gonna end up demolishing yourself
Bro, that whole part you were talking bout? I didn't know if your were referring to me or talking about yourself
Cuz it ain't nothing worse in the world than that track that you did with Stan
What was it the Four Horsies? You guys got back together back in Scribble Jam?
Or was it at the Rap Olympics fam?
...Either way, nobody fucking gives a damn!
Aye listen bro, I pull it out and I snap it & click & BAM!
Kinda like my gat already had an app for Instagram!
This motherfucker wants to take my ass to Dizneyland
Sorry dad, I'mma scratch that becuz I have a different plan
How bout I take you to the ranch in Neverland
& put you in a casket quicker than a thousand miligrams of Michael Jackson's diprivan!
Fucker thought he was gonna come back & kill me, man this motherfucker Canibus sucks!
Besides, all it took back in the day was 2 l's and a cool J to roll Canibus up!
And since we in Cali, I'ma pour magazines in him; that's what I call a Canibus cup!
But I'm just clownin' wit you...
You obviously a mark, don't make this clown shit an issue
I'll rip ya body apart, I'll fire rounds from the pistol
My shells are like the red ones from Mario Kart cuz they follow you around til they hit you!
My guns gonna feel like a merry-go-round once they 'gainst you
Cuz they gonna lift you four horsies off the ground & then spin you!
That's some crazy shit whenever you reach the top
Let's say right now you can fuckin' take me on, yea..I've already got this region locked
Bro, I am the King of the Dot
You? Ooh...let me teach you something bruh, let me teach you how to keep the spot
You couldn't, cuz your value in it would decrease the stock
But this ain't 2000 BC, I guess he forgot
Mothafucka, you shouldn't even talk
His old ass is probably still sitting here waiting for the beat to drop!
You're not even sharp, atleast not enough for me, not enough for this league
I mean, what good is marching on soft sand when you don't have strong enough feet to walk on concrete
And your schemes are not built up to par with the top tiers we got
Man, you should take it a little easy pops, 'cuz you're gettin a lil old & out here people speed alot..
Proceed with caution, there ain't no beat in this arena to cover up your cheesy bars
I can visibly see your flaws, allowing me to use them as a weakness that I'm feeding off
But the leading cause of beef that's caused between us is a missing link of not being able to think or ever be evolved
See, it's easy to see why he dissolved
Because he's a subspecies, so even though everything we're taught to believe revolves
Around us being engineered human beings, we're clearly not because seeing people like him breathin' are the real reasons I don't believe in God!
And if there's like a 1 in a fucking 6 billion chance that my theory's wrong?
I put my cheese up on it that this idiot would completely defeat the odds
You ain't a thief that robs people 'cuz you evil dog
You a thief that robs people cuz you need a job!
You wanna eat? Then I beat you over the head with a piece of beefkabob
And let you bleed across the street from Ross, the same place you faggots buy your t-shirts off!
Homie, I will kill you as soon as the fucking needle drops
Run outside, and have my homies let the heater off & blood will be fillin up the street like it was Cedar block!
You're not strong enough to top your peak
Just face it, you've aged and you've gotten weak
You can no longer keep on pace with today's top elites
Not acapella, or on a beat
Stop stop blogging please if not at least while you still got a spot to keep
You used to be a role model to all these geeks
Even gangstas looked up to you like when a respected father speaks
See the problem is, to hiphop, you are unique
That's why it also bothers me
'Cuz I feel like I'm putting my own dog to sleep!
Watchin the karma seep..watchin him burn alive from the inside as the karma seeps
From your eyes onto your rotten cheeks
Cuz the Canibus we used to know, now is a shallow surface that's far from deep
& all that's left for you at the end is the nightmares that haunt ya sleep
Along with the psychological scars you keep as a product of the karma you've gotten from fucking over all ya peeps!
So I don't give a fuck! Homie I get my G on
I'm a real MC, mothafuckas I get my free on
So it makes sense that this mothafucka here has this stupid ass sling on
Cuz he's never been a good shoulder to lean on!

.
.

[Round 3: Canibus]
Yo, that's not what I would call Diz, See Diz is something different
A faggot nigga tryna make a living off of dissin'
He walk around spittin battle raps like he ill
But he can't avoid the fact, yea he do got skills
2012 I still spit that shit real niggas feel
Why does 99% of you resemble Madd Illz?
Too late, wipe that stupid look off ya face
(something), lookin like that indian from Office Space
Dizaster, just stop it! You tryna battle on some pop shit
You weak, and you sound like Andy Milanokis!
Ayo brotha, I'm just here to tell you that God loves all his creations except you
And after tonight, ya battle rap career will be through!
Then I'mma hop into the back seat of your cab & ride
The fuck you lookin at me for, Ali? Drive!
Ayo this ain't no regular battle
This about your intellectual power
A cold blooded disrespect for an hour
Genocide by drone strike, Dizaster's bones in a cave
He in the Strone Age, playing cee-lo with stone dice
God put me here to eat shit & die!
But when I made the infinite rhyme? He changed his mind
But you? You just a funny guy
...with peanut-butter brown honey eyes
When I look into the windows of ya soul? I don't see much inside
That's why right here right now, June 9th, 06/06
Canibus gonna prove that Dizaster ain't shit!
Ayo I stick dick to ya moms
Build a nuclear bomb & put it in her thong!
I rediscovered Hip-Hop with my infinite rhyme
I'll even put the president back in office one more time
I charge Oprah's credit card, & tell Barack to go long for another 90 yards
Mothafucka I'm a Hip-Hop god! 20 years and I still got job
I'm sayin' if you want change? Go wash them shit stains out ya draws
You immature fecal spore
Got the nerve to say you a beast with the bars
Don't you still live with your moms?
That's right, dick in ya mouth!
Parents had to kick you out the house
After that? You moved in with your spouse
I can't tell if you a deadbeat dad, or a red meat fag
Or a greasy ass nasty piece of Lebanese trash

#

[Round 3: Dizaster]
Yo! Let me just end this fuckin' battle! If anymore of this shit's gonna get postponed
This mothafucka's mad at me, cuz he's always gettin' his ho boned!
He said I live at home with my parents! You're right, I'm 28 and I live in a crib that I don't own
But that makes me more qualified to smoke Canibus because I've always been home grown!
Don't be mad tho, you lost to the MVP! I will always still be the best emcee!
I'm just mad at you because I took all this time to prepare and you fuckin' disrespected me!
You disrespected me, like you disrespected all
You disrespected Pharoahe Monch, you disrespected Wyclef, you hated on 'em all
Anybody doing more than you, you preyed, and you waited on their fall
That's why I ain't speakin' for me, I'mma say this for us all
That's why Hip-Hop has forsaken you, and here you don't deserve a place at all
But in the restroom next to the toilet, hanging by the stall
But you don't even deserve to hang there either, cuz I can still find more appreciation on the piss stains that're on the wall
You had a legendary cypher with DMX, Big Pun, and Mos Def my dude
Yeah that shit is true, we seen it online, it got plenty of views
But the problem with that, is that you said you deserved to go last out of all of them what makes you think you credible or even legible to?
'Cuz 10 years have passed, and the evidence proved that them three did more for hip-Hop individually than you ever could do!
So I don't want you to get mad, let this just be a lesson to you
To act selfish in a cypher is something that's hella self-centered to do
But you're Canibus... it's ok, you get a pass 'cuz it's expected from you
You think you're bigger than Pun? Pun is a legend my dude
He's a worldwide icon that's sold more records and he's more respected than you
You? You're just a homeless man... on the corner holdin' a can beggin' for food
Just accept it! You're through!
Accept that you were never accepted, instead you just do some extra reckless shit & just prove
You' will always be a liability to anybody that's invested in you!
Just ask Wyclef! Ask Wyclef, he'll tell you like the rest of them dudes
Your album flopped when it dropped, so you stabbed him in the back because you couldn't get it to move
When you should've said thank you to him, 'Cuz he's the one that helped you improve!
Wassup M80? Where you at you pathetic Jew?
Together you are like fucking tumors in the business that needs to get removed!
Everyone that you ever did business with to help your music in the end is getting screwed
Yourself included!
What about all the efforts and attempts that you did..
To get us sued becuz some shit in the contract was left excluded?
Yea! Don't believe nothing he's sayin! If you do then your head's polluted
This is why he's a disrespectful piece of shit, & he's hettin executed!
I don't wanna hear about how ur presence helps the movement
It's more like an infection to it
You ain't here for us, you're here to fuckin sell some units!
How you gonna help us when you haven't even showed no sign of self-improvement?
Just the same old, pathetic, under-developed human
...Who never went through evolution!
I mean, this dude is stone age! Why try to relate with 'em?
I should go on Myspace to find him a 'primate' to go on a blind date with 'em
Cuz in his mindstate...that would be the 'prime mate' for him!
He's a chrome magnum man...a homosapien bipedal & shell, with the brain missin
The way that he reacts, he has strange thinkin, the way he displays rhythm
He's so ancient, I can't even communicate with 'em
It's like he has the most important strand of DNA missing
So it has nothing to do with racism
When I say Isee the ape in 'em!
I'll stab you in your fuckin eyes with a giant identical set of forks
-to Poseidon's, or the type of forks that Lucifer pitches inside of the fires in Hell that scorch
When I'm rhyming, I'm at the center core
Of a high-pressure reservoir of eternal fire that's strong enough to survive behind heaven's door
And if you stay alive, I'mma keep firin with the rifle like I'm tryna set the record storm
Your body will show up at a fuckin beach somewhere dead, you can finally rest a shore/assure!
This motherfucker, has spent his whole life on a message board
He's always on the net, this guy's like a tennis court
I mean, the crease above your eyes look like vinyl record warps
You look like some time of Kenyan dwarf, collided with a virally infected I Am Legend corpse
Spliced with the fuckin DNA of the alien from Splice or some other type of genetic source
That was developed directly inside of the Umbrella Corp
You killed the crowd, no one wants to even react no more!
What you actin' like a fuckin faggot for?
So I'mma end it with this last scheme-
Everything that he did was toally fucking wack and was overhyped
Your fucking deposit for this battle was totally overpriced
But it's worth it knowing that we can go home at night
Knowing some lunatic named Germaine Williams doens't own the rights!
Cuz if he did he would probably attach the footage to the back of a radioactive protocol device
Or something else that completely never existed, like his military soldier stripes!
Who gives a fuck if "so and so" sold their soul for ice?
You're becoming more of an attention whore with every metaphor you write
This motherfucker's terrified of anybody that's 5'9 cuz it reminds him of Royce's height!
When you get killed in a battle, you're supposed to fight
What're you, like 40 right?
All you did was burn bridges like Usher, you're the corny type
You blackballed yourself into the horizon with Benzino with you on the back of the motorbike!
Have you seen that tattoo on his arm? LL hates him, of course he's hype
This motherfucker couldn't beat him in a battle, so he turned around and literally stole his mic
So how the fuck are you gonna call J. Cole J. Clone, callin him a clone despite
Knowing that the only tat on your arm showing ain't even your own prototype!
Homie it's over! Go home, goodnight
You wanna threaten LL and show up to the video with Mike
But we're all thinkin, of course you roll with Mike
You and him are both alike 'cuz judgin by that tattoo, both you faggots were born to bite!
Yeah, so he's gonna talk about how I choked and didn't own the fucking moment right?
He'll probably mention some shit, he didn't, but I'mma still own him right?
Ayo this motherfucker shouldn't be mad at me, cuz I'm the one who helped him walk back toward the light
I'm the one that showed him what real hope is like!
Yea, I'm the one that gave him a chance, after the industry already disowned him twice
They fuckin' left him, they controlled his life
So I don't give a FUCK if I choked up in a battle or if I froze that night
Cuz Canibus over here fuckin' choked in LIFE!
Nobody wants to hear anymore, so I'mma shoot to this fuckin' faggot
I'll pull out a bazooka and shoot 'em while he's moving through traffic
I'mma Islamic suicidal, cuckoo fanatic
I'll put Canibus in a box, and LL Cool J's a FAGGOT![Vocal Layer 1: Canibus]
I got bored with four beats to the measure
Professor speech compressor terminated his tenure to explore more rewarding adventure
Take a closer look at the bars
You'll see I'm not behind them or in front of them, I'm one of them
Started with a 100, the Game spit 3, I said, "Fuck it
I'ma have to show these niggas something"
Too easy, who'd believe me if I said that it wasn't?
The rhyme is a weapon, I bust it, the Brotherhood got me covered
OP orders with coordinates where to drop mortars
I drive forward, sandstorms make my eyes water
Skull is a submarine hull
Dolphin phones screen calls from places as far away as A.G.C.R
The rhymes are raw, deeper than yours
You crawled before you walked but didn't think about your thoughts before you talked
We spit for sport, I won you lost
But you paid them off to nail my corpse to a cross
This is 'The Greatest Rhyme of All Time' supposedly
1000 Bars it will probably always be
Mentally top heavy, not many can rock with me
Hip Hop could not bench me so they plot to suspend me
I said, "Nobody benefits, everyone perishes"
I tell them this, they say, "Here, it's time for your medicine"
Imagine being fined over a rhyme for stepping over the line
When I inspired Hova and Nas
I listened to '44 4's' 22 times
'I Gave You Power', God stop my heart if I'm lying
You like red or white wine? Let's talk about it I'm buying
Let's talk about the Children of Zion, excuse me if I start crying
The art of rhyming? I've mastered it certainly, surely
I'll celebrate capturing it for my taxidermy
From the streets of New Jersey to Germany
To the jungles of Angola where most the meat poachers heard of me
The Ice Truck Killer will be observing me perform surgery
Ritual Widow Murder, searching for her urgently
Mix the blood so it don't coagulate
The sex magik won't work if the bitch masturbates
I put her on cloud nine, look at her face
A cumulus lenticularis, a capsule in Space
You will become acquainted with my cryptic language
And my mystic manners, Rip spit bananas
Systematic Global geographic systemic neosynapsis
Reload the graphics, notice I spit it rapid
Advanced Step in Innovative Mobility
Most MCs try to clone me lyrically
My cell chemistry is a mirror of who I am physically
But my true symmetry is energy
The Will of Claude Ashur
The skill of GermaineFather Author Poor Pauper Pastor, more than a rapper
My body is a human machine, my dreams filter in between
Just wait until I build my machine
Kill you with weed vapour, then a taser, then a laser
Then a maser, then a phaser, then something they call scalar
"That is not dead which can eternally lie
And with strange aeons even death may die"
But why? Coup de grâce for the coup d'État
In a man made lodge the Moon rays replace God
I think I've had about enough of your tough talk
Come over here take my cuffs off, I promise you we'll just talk
No biting allowed just bark, don't run just walk
Battle Rap there is no such art
Emotion manifests thought, thought manifests words, actions and reality
This is not fantasy
If you question me, you will be detained indefinitely
Your name will be added to the Blacklist Registry
I'm a scruffy old man with bloody cold hands
On my arm is a tattoo of a sully old brand
If I am not myself, then how would I be?
If I do not look tell me how will I see?
The Law of Attraction is attracted to me
The laws of poetry in action is practiced quite actively
I look at my face more than anybody else
I still can't recognize myself
I don't need anybody but myself
When I'm rhyming like this I don't need no help
But, thank you for your purchase, these verses have perennial purpose
But on the other hand these rappers are worthless
At least from my interconnected introspective perspective
The more pretentious, the more apprehensive the sentence
You are lazy, you wanna be the best, you crazy
The best train everyday of the week
My lyricism amplifies every letter written
Rip the Jacker spitting inside a Zero Vector Systems
Brain waves reveal High Yield E&D Fields
Chew MCs like I'm eating a meal
A bunch of fake niggas tryna keep it pseudo real
A bunch of fake King Midas' with fools gold grills
My microphone was found where the Mayan Sun Stone was
The Period of Purification in my poems
Mad Max Beyond Thunderdome under red rock
It's no use if you can't use what you got
Buried in a mass grave covered in bones
My cell phone number's placed on their tombstones
Your girl Gertrude promised me her servitude
She better do it, I don't wanna have to hurt you dude
I'll eat from the same portion as you
Just in case you try to poison my food but I want you to
A deer hunter all year if I could spare summers
Fucking your whore of a mother in front of her queer husband
Wide lens wide mattress she's an actress
This is Monster Ball practice, I'm Big Billy Bob Black Angus
You and I can sit and look at each other
Tossing knowledge back and forth like we was throwing books at each other
I don't care if we're not the same colour, nigga I'm your brother
I don't care what you say nigga you a nigga lover
All cultures come from One Mind
The Universe is not far behind, waves, bars and rhymes
Motivated by the stars that shine
Only lower density life forms get lost in time
I don't care if I make history, I wanna be a part of infinity
Look at what your sun god did to me
I am energy, I am He spiritually and mentally
The fools who threw away my jewels offended me
As we walk through the archived files of all styles
The East Wing Isle goes on for five miles
More rappers than fans, more fans wrapped in vans
Hip Hop will continue to expand
Poets should be rappers, rappers should be lyricists
The current industry model collapse imminent
This is Hollywood Hip Hop
Celebrities adopt little snot nosed bugaboos from off the block
Larry King Live, earthquake right outside
I looked that squarely shouldered man square in his eye
Poetically paralyzing, where Are You? Are you hiding?
No! I am sandbag diving
Do not evade question
Please explain to your viewers how there are space weapons bigger than Zeppelins
How is it so? Tell the people, they need to know
And if you don't think so, you're a talk show ho
The grown up who showed up drunk with his own cup stoned as fuck
Who could tell me that this poem is luck
You say I'm crazy, I say "So, tell me something I don't know"
Something my psyche profile doesn't show
I don't have all the answers I am not in the know
I can only see what is above and only from below
The substratum of reality through the thick cloud canopy
How can it be Canibus? Answer me!
I approached the podium, and delivered my encomium
Nobody applauded the atmosphere was ominous, 130
They feared I would spit, they don't like when I bust
The mucus dried up to a pear like crust
From a very cold place called Faraday Base
Right next to the South Pole's longest Ice Strait
Food supply low, they speak of going above ground to find mo
I cry out "No, do not go!"
Where the fuck are you going?
400mph wind belts blowing, think for a moment
We got to wait it out, that's what the training's about
We have to survive, that's what Germaine is about
Arctic geography is conducive to astronomy
And the study of celestial bodies, follow me
The sheer size of the academia implied by the rhymes
Lead them to believe I was lying
I blasted through the limestone with water mixed with a dissolver
Then I signalled the remaining cave crawlers
Dig a hole for the collateral carnage, Battle the hardest
Take out Hip Hops trash & garbage
Tunnel boring and jacking, water main tapping
I sat there drafting a new drainage plan laughing, 150
Tough, pliable, relatively reliable
The vocation of this undertaking is very viable
My lyrical is chemical radioactive residue
I can't rest until I accomplish what I was sent to do
The gross oversimplication of a Jamaican
In a basement tracing over diagrams for a tape deck
That evolved into a spaceship, that hasn't been made yet
Cause I haven't been paid yet, not even one pay check
I walked through the valley of humiliation
But Hip Hop started hating, I tried to save them they wasn't patient
160 Responsibility entrusted
There's only one way for me to prove that I love it
That's why I'm busting
If you pursue revenge, dig many graves
Be sure to add your name to the list that you've made
Musically still producing, I got a couple new things cocooning
But Poet Laureate is my New Shit!
Distinguished English and Sophisticated senses
In sync with the Talisman I received from the Temptress
With these lyrics I consecrate the spirit
Whenever I spit it, concentrate you can hear it
I've almost perfected this, I'm one word away from excellence
When I find it I'll begin testing it
The phenomenal beast astronomer priest
When the poles shift the Sun will not rise from the East
Wilder than the wilderness, I'm bout to show you
Who wildebeest Williams is, you better be filming this
A blast so cataclysmic, it warps the time and space within it
The hours become minutes, the minutes become infinite lyrics
Poet Laureate spit from the spirit, from the Sirius Star system
To observe the Gods, my thoughts graduated to the Stars, 180
To infinity, listen to the bars
The Kapellmeister in the battle grinder, created by King Osiris
My psychic wall larger than Chinas
The thirst to rhyme at first hurts like a laborious childbirth
And sounds like Chinese fireworks
Several million years into the past
A primitive future in a world without oil and gas
Focus on two standards when assessing the threat
Number 1 is capacity, Number 2 is intent
The Flood was not an obstacle
I made a raft out of empty milk gallon bottles, for survival
Always remember, meet me in Denver
Colorado Springs in the Vandenberg welcome center
Four and a half foot beings with big black eyes
Tried to trap me and extract my rhymes all the time
I perform a requiem on the Eve before Hip Hop ends
And make amends on behalf of my friends
Canibus grab the mic like an energized amulet
Then spit a rap that you can't forget
Oprah Winfrey don't like rap
All I got to say about that is "She probably don't like Black"
I don't blame her, she don't understand it's only entertainment
She'd probably feel different if she wasn't famous
She traded places and her opinions started changing
As Randolph and Mortimer increased her wages
That alone could make a person racist, if not racist with colour?
Then material wise how we treat each other
The head of a lion, the legs of an eagle
The wings of a dragon, not the sigil, this is for real though
I sit down and think, when I write I can smell the ink
I bow before the desert wall of the Sphinx
The ideas have come from God, even I am stunned
1000 Bars from the real Iron Lungs
I heard Hip Hop was dead, that's not fair
Who I talk to?, go he there Nasir
Poet Laureate Infinity
I WILL FOREVER BE THE ILLEST LYRICALLY!

Poet Laureate Infinity
Poet Laureate Infinity
Poet Laureate Infinity
THIS NEVER BEEN DONE BEFORE IN HISTORY!

[Vocal 2]
I procured a small piece of the treasure, collections from a former era
Dating back to forever, the warrior became protector
Quoted from the book of the law, I don't govern them, I summon them
Speaking in tongues again
Started with a trumpet, woodwinds, strings, then the conductor brings the
Drums in, fingers trigger the drum kit
Other emcees be nervous or something
Rhymes in abundance, Hip Hop Justice, Rappers are captured and punished
Drawn and quartered, liars are denied water, you still alive?
I repeat in a revised order
My skull is a submarine hull
Screen doors protect the motherboard core from extreme heat warp
My mind dives deep beneath yours
Poseidon Trident Seahorse bubbles form I scream with extreme force
Marinaras Trench detour to Ultima Thule, Let me explain what my sonar saw
Upholding the Holy Rosary, patrolling the Open Sea
At U-Boat speed beneath the Tsunami, where I'm supposed to be
Industrialists, civilians women and children directly
Military chiefs, aristocrats in the buildings
Membership is based off your raw intelligence
400 screen video editing with hard evidence
The clinical Professor of rhymes from Pepperdine
Co-signed by GlaxoSmithKline designs
The Universe provided the lighting to see what I was writing
The results were blinding, lyrics, timing
Shut the fuck up and stop whining
Instinct controls how you think before deciding, so keep vibing
Swimming naked in the open, a shark begins to circle me
Instead of trying to murder me, it tried to flirt with me
I got away nervously, talked about it purposefully
Next time I see it, it's going to have a word with me
I guess it wasn't meant to be
Under an assumed Identity I resumed PsyOps on the enemy
USA made, field grade steel face
Moving at a Canibus pace in the proto subspace
I am not here to negotiate eliminate
The face on the photograph we have in our database
No emcee could rhyme like this, there's no challenge
His Poet Laureateship pontificates balance
This lyrical pyramid was discovered by accident
I know I could build it faster if I block and tackle it
Judge me fairly, compare me
To Dante Alighieri's Purgatorio theory
Assigned to train and equip to spit who's ready?
I'll need a volunteer, do I have any?
Next year I'll get my SPINGS a master space badge
After that I'll stop flying fixed wing aircraft
Most of you will never understand what I mean
My dreams are broken into storyboard scenes
Worm screw elevators, descending to the bottom of the volcano's crater
The Devils Chamber
"That is not dead which can eternally lie
And with strange aeons even death may die"
The leaders lies got me reassigned, my loyalty was redefined
They will not be allowed to see the rhymes
What ought to crawl has learned to walk
One ought not to think is what Rumsfeld thought
I'm a take you for a walk through a beautiful place called Honey Swamp
We'll shoot hoops at Mosquito Lagoon Park
The whirlpool of gravity traps me
Still allowing me to circle the M51 galaxy
Rap for me reduces the stress dramatically
Negative time produces antigravity
Inject the gas into the centrifuge mass
The Teleological Dynamic will enhance
Watch me wet up you weed then bust up you teeth
Make you run for your life like there is a buss up the street
The Dr. and I would meet, at 29 palms Joshua street
I always had a lot to debrief
Killing my health, Killing myself
Rebuilding myself, nobody feel what I felt
Modifying the weather from behind a weather shield
Writing with a feathered quill, getting more ill
The woman who is there for, she will take care of you
With Nexium, Avodart, Lipitor, and Theraflu
Rap Music Profession Immunosuppressants
One question per second, One answer per session
Hip Hop made me, Hip Hop praise me
Ain't nothing changed me since 1980
Involuntary catalepsy, BATTLE ME BABY!!!
1000 BARS NIGGA AFTER THAT MAYBE!!
Murder, murder, murder, kill kill kill drills
Williams was real ill, but now I chill
An asteroid field where every rock shaped like my seal
I do it for the civilians, I do it for the soldiers
Raptors, Comanches, STRYKERS, Cobras
Back at the TOC with GW PRESCOTT
Grid location missile lock lift up the block
I gotta spit 'til the story is told
It's a gift, this story is a part of my soul
We shouldn't keep fighting, the Earth is our home
If we destroy Mother Earth, where will we go?
Starving in destitution, Dying for retribution
Why would you wanna' blow a hospital? You stupid?
Why would you not force yourself to make better music?
Our now fruitless creations used to be in abundance
Like something harder than Tungsten, break your arm if you punch it
I ride on a flatbed chariot, 4 ostriches carry it
I control their movements with lariats
Polygraphs flutter, the Lovecraft Craft Lover
Quoting my favourite Inventor, "I see excitement coming"
I raise my hand, lightening bolts stream from it
I see excitement coming, I see excitement coming
Unsatisfied, I decide to redefine rhyme
To create product of an applied mind
They say "we're divided" I say we're small minded
Right after I said it I moved to a small island
There was no contingency plan given to me
Tell the motherfucker send his transcripts to me
Swear your allegiance the tuition is free
To be a mini me version with minor abilities
7.83 hertz from the Earth magnified
Signal Intelligence emanating from your mind
At the Observatory summit of Mt. Graham
Looking through this starlight scope in my hand
Beautiful longitudinal musical lyrics
Fragments of Olympian Gossip is my vision
If A is a success in life
Then A must equal X plus Y plus Z no doubt
If work equals X and play equals Y
Then Z must be equal to you shutting your mouth
Surprisingly got The John Campbell award for writing
By summarizing that rhyming can be dehumanizing
From the Kinetic to the Energetic
To the magnetic, ultra, electro, and uncensored resonance
I need to be alone
You cannot comfort me like my poems
1000 BARS put me in the zone
The Pope shook, they ransacked Rome and burnt books
I ran back home to hide mine in the woods
Salute, I would like to propose this next toast
To maturation barrels I carved from French Oak
The minerals where they grow determine the stability of the flow
I might get drunk and boast
Corruption is necessary, but tell me who's the beneficiary
Which one of us will sing Hail Mary?
Hip Hop supposed to be about endurance
But every time you rhyme not just when I'm touring
Acupuncture point or plus, is not enough
I need more pain so I can pretend to be tough
The facts too acute to repute, or debate
My face, is a slim sleek gas mask shape
My dream was identical seven nights in a row
I saw a sideways 8 wrapped around a microphone
The window is closing, from the other side it looks like it's opening
Where am I trying to go with this?
Fire and Ash fallout, that's what it's all about
We must construct a shelter, and then build a wall around it
All the parents want to do is look at the body but
It won't happen 'til AFTER the official autopsy
A good psychological environment for science
I'm memorizing visualizing peace and quiet
Father Author Poor Pauper has poor posture
As filthy as the collar of a dirty grave robber
This is my unacknowledged special access project
Time reversed waves in nonlinear optics
The coral reef is changing from green to amber
Scientist scramble to come up with new answers
The truth is well within my sphere of pursuit
But I'm unprepared to take action just like you
The innate need for Canibus to be professional
Make it difficult indeed for me to connect with you
Greetings and salutations, my equations are inundated with information
Electro cranial stimulation
Burn skin off face, burn face off skeletal plate
Plasma Ray Gun is just one explanation
Man Made Membrane roofing remediation
Any and ALL entry points have immigration
One meter beside the Hubble outside the bubble, the effects of gravity on my
Muscles were quite subtle
I do what I want to do, I have always been that way
Because I have always thinked that way
Attach the piezoelectric transducer to your computer
Poet Laureate is the future
Pulsating lights and sounds surrounds spirits
Bio-oral Beats, layered underneath lyrics
250 thousand cycles per second, for Dolphin hearing
The electrical optical coupling Gear is effective
88 Kilometres above the planet
My rhymes harness a power beyond your understanding
The Gods began to call me, I looked up
Stars fell towards me and scorched me to a metaphor freak
The authentic Command Doctrine of George Washington
Himself, GW I'm positive it's him
I proof read my writtens, eat a chicken with the skin missing
Spend the whole night out binge drinking
Executive Director of Civic Participation spitting
First it was vote or die, Now it's don't vote, Why?
Weed is now legalized are you high?
Rhymes compartmentalized seperatized to prevent bootlegging pirates
Be my guest keep trying
The bird chirps dying in the dirt because the earth is hurt
But not before I start cursing first
Not so fast Mr. Iconoclast
If you don't leave the bottle outside you can't pass
Gather the evidence, then give it to the President
Don't reprimand him, ask him for help next, 190
A lamp with no electrode will not glow
We need some new bright ideas that we did not know
You cannot fold under the political pressure
You must take prudent and precautionary measures
I think of rhymes in my mind when I autograph sign
I can't wait to sign an autograph for the last time
A Luciferian web, everyday we are burying dead
Every colour in America bled
Empirical evidence of the greatest collection of Canibus sentences
You'll never reach the end of it, 200
Fire and forget, rhyme for respect
I didn't get that so I wrote Poet Laureate
The Hubble Space Telescope images changed Bis
And nothing on this Planet can dissuade this
They left me dehydrated by the Nile River naked but I made it
With passion of a Microphone Patriot
Music is my bread and butter, why should I suffer
My publicist said she could get me the TIME LIFE cover
The spin off from the Press should be able to feed you
But I declined cause I'm familiar what greed can do
I can not lose or win
I would only like to be remembered as the dark skinned Lizard King
Into the bottomless pool of Poetry I plunge
Let it be said, let it be written, let it be done
Publicly coming forward with my metaphors to share
About the space serpents flying around in the troposphere
Poet Laureate Infinity
I will forever be the illest lyrically

Poet Laureate Infinity
Poet Laureate Infinity
Poet Laureate Infinity
This never been done before in history

[Vocal 3]
I spit at a thousand KIPS, kilo tons of pressure
Every letter is measured in such a way you will remember
December, 21st 2012 is the code
It was placed on the sunstone to puzzle them
Starting with some numbers, the code crackers start crunching
I better have some results by the months end
Really, Deep Blue computes deeply and does it
What is the answer to Universe? Read me the numbers
In the summer the Polar Manitoba's melted by lava
A team of ER doctors climbed aboard the chopper
My skull is a submarine hull
I empty the ballast tanks I could smell the shit from the sea gulls
The Rear Admirable participated in battle every war, and at least half of my
Crew were injured every tour
We thought close support from the Navy Carriers and Air Force would give us
All what we needed, we were wrong
Canibus is notably known Globally
My verbal sorcery somehow talks to the beat
Lyrically you not ready, dress right dress
Not messy, my muscle memory make me bomb squad steady
You can't contend with this when I let it rip
Eyes, ears, nose & throat specialist Professor Bis
The sublime chakra one thru nine
Thru the spine induce the rhyme
Internal fire produces the high
Recite 33 3's 33 times
For 24hrs, 21 thousand Nautical miles
Ahead of my lifetime I write and recite rhymes
Deja Vu in the booth is the truth, when you apply it
Devine design, a miracle of Metallurgy
Every clergy member from Mecca who heard of me worshipped me
From the shores of Normandy to the Turkish streets
To the bluest oceans glowing on the Persian beach
Nuclear Biological Chemical emergency
I purchase the beat then mix my spit with the mercury
The DJ grabs the acetate out the crate
Mix the dub plate, the BPMs fluctuate
Nobody can hold me back, my flow bloviates to a spiritual shape
As I co-create rap, 30
Cold callous chronic chemical imbalance
Smoking a chalice in the Rabbit hole with Alice
The target appears in brackets, I attack it
Access then egress then quit this rap shit
Commander of the symphony when man meets ministry
Finishing my Archeogenetic Rap Facility
They can't battle me so they'd rather embarrass me
By being mad at me they commit microphone heresy
I am still the Master
As handsome as my unborn Grandson, Rip The Jacker
Call me grandpa, 40 as odd as it may seem
The microphone fiend is God of the Hip Hop regime
Planet Rock Supreme
Kill you with green Lasers, evaporated weed vapour, Electromagnetic Scalar
Then something they call a Maser
"That is not dead which can eternally lie
And with strange aeons even death may die"
Meteors fall from the sky, The Mars God looks at my eyes
Controlling my heart, controlling my mind
Oh Lord, Tell me what to do, Tell me oh Lord
I have mastered the art of rhyming I am so bored
My pain my joy my thoughts I've passed them on thru songs
Respond to me and I will answer to your call
Emotion manifests Thought, Thought manifests Words Actions & Reality
That's how it has to be
In front of me, on both sides and in back of me
I hear them talk about battling me in the whispering gallery
The chain of command blames the unseen hand
The Galactic Plane has a Galactic Plan
I look up in the sky to see if God is judging me
Suddenly I feel Fatima and Medjugorie come to me, 60
Sitting down at the mixing board/round/banquet table comfortably
They begin to study me, by showing me worlds I would love to see
My body did not melt beyond the Van Allen Belt
I was transformed into a spirit with no shell
I could move about freely, I rose & I fell
The coldness of heaven is like the coldness of hell
Metaphoric Sun Worship, pulling me with planet like inertias
Words blinking like the text edit cursor
My sentences are sometimes too sensitive to make sense of it
Layer upon layer upon layer unedited
You lazy & you wanna' be the best? You crazy!
The Best Train EVERYDAY of the week
Propulsion system is gravity driven, white hot thermal
External vision, Every lyric got a wormhole in it
Saint Germaine is real, Germaine is a sage for real
My sigil is the double headed eagle seal
Normal life is not real, we are cogs in a wheel
We work we hurt we search we

Feel
The microphonist that utilizes the study of Conics
Circular motion in both the para- and the hyperbolas
Tiger Woods knows this, everytime he plays golf he shows this
A true master at the masters in focus
In my time of need, I am not alone
I was told in a dream by Cthulhu from his tomb
Try to hurt me, I'll murder you, lay you down vertical
Made your life purposeful, germinated the earth with you
My black goggles, are covered with Bat Guano
I'll hang from the ceiling and watch you, act hostile I'll pop you
Rap Music and those who listen to it don't owe me nothing
I don't want nothing from you, not even your judgement
The Philosophic maverick the massive knowledge magnet
Underwater sea lilies are the source of my magic
Matricidal motherfucker homicidal hustler
Filibuster, never been a Wikipedia lover
If I were you I wouldn't waste time reading that rubbish
It might turn you into a media puppet, but fuck it
Leviathan divides the suspect zero sign
Therefore I rhyme for all time
Metaphor and Rhyme is poetry by design
But poetry continues outside the timeline
Unnatural battle ability, the enemy tried to imprison me
But they would've been better off killing me
Theoretically Shiaperrelli has mentored me
With motifs of illuminated speech and wizardry
Over The Horizon Radar Rhymes
Patent number 4686605
Sound pours out of the ground across the land
Jethro Tull was mauled by the god called Pan
Creative writing and rhythm, grammar and composition
Don't ignore me, ignore the fool who tells you not to listen
To you it shouldn't sound like I'm quitting cause I'm not
If I am to continue it's up to Hip Hop
Weary of body and mind, tired of swimming against the tide
Why swim or walk when I can glide?
Zero Gravity exercising, requires expert timing, for sky diving
My call sign is Flying Wing
An impossible profession
St. Germaine was made to explain the lesson with a 1000 Bar message
Now you may go
You have graduated, now you may know
Tell the world exactly what you were shown
Sho nuff, sesame street poems brought to you by Sears Roebuck
Countdown 48 more months
Does it amaze me? "NO!" Does it phase me? maybe a little yo
Gotta' find a way to generate doe
Promoter won't pay me what I want for a show
Why do it for free when I'm worth my weight in gold?
Mind Body & Soul inseparable, incredibly
Proto plasma recycles the matter perpetually
Hip Hop became boring, lyrics seem more like a vestigial organ
But they should be more important
The diaphragm, the thymus
Activate the latent powers that reside inside us with 13 chakras
You get the Guantanamo Bay, the Alcatraz way
You heard what I say? These pigs gotta' pay!
I steady my approach, this supposed to be a no fly zone
Black sheep squadron with strobe light hoes
The hurricane's eye's open
Gale winds blowing, Moses on a row boat floating in the ocean
I figured out, how to save water in a drought
If we save the right amount I know we can make it out
The ever expanding mind commanding body do you copy?
The quantum biology biopsy
My austere designs are so ahead of their time
Even when you press rewind your still left behind
Father Author Poor Pauper, breaths to draw Prana
In a yoga pose tryna get close to yo mama
Your ear cartilage has been targeted, The bombing will commence
Don't be a bitch nigga you started it
On the Sabbath I write preplanning for the Planet
Drawing mathematics, suspended in space as holographics
Scientifically Quantifiable megalomaniacal
Viable style it's like trying to ride a Bull
The lyrical inimical is miserable because I've built a citadel
Of syllables that made me invincible
Am I a mad man or a mason? A patriot or a pagan?
West Coasting in a 64 with Rose Gold Daytons
The propulsion system matrix is poorly calibrated
I'm waiting on the parts special order replacements
Battle Rap is just aimless entertainment
Second Round Knockout was one of they favourites, Fuck all the haters
My luck was crushed, I felt like they fronted
My heart kept pumping, I had to do something
I turned the page, wrote a turn of phrase
Verbal X-Rays, they say "I don't burn I blaze"
Don't look at it like winning or losing, in '98 it was amusing
But Poet Laureate is my New Shit!
Time keep on slipping the Ripper keeps ripping
But right now my image stands still in a prism
My light reflects like a mirror, I choose to share it
The Precession of Earth is nearing, I'm preparing
Assessment and Planning things, should I put mustard on these sandwiches, a
Fathers job is so challenging
My pupil size increase, constriction and velocity decrease
You can't Emcee take a seat
What are you building Bis? Is it a flying Silver Disk?
If you ever leave you'll be missed
I tear thru the Galactic drift, I travel 10 digits in 10 minutes
Now that's some shit! You think that's fast? Nah....
That's faster than you think, By the time you blink, the whole Universe shrinks
A word to the wise, try to keep your eyes in the skies
And try to keep your ears on my rhymes
A magic reminder that the fire will not expire
Pyrus Sidonious gives me energy when I'm tired
The Sun is so bright my eyes hurt, I'm forced to look downward
Now I see inside the Earth
I Thank Mother Gaia for bearing us green grass
But it won't last we're killing her with greenhouse gas
You said "the best shouldn't have to ask for respect"
Is that correct? Yes could you please speak up, I SAID YES!
I hold Hip Hop responsible
Every magazine writer that wrote bullshit in their articles
Gone 'til November? I'll be gone forever
I made these bars so you could ALL remember
The illest MC to put it all on the line
My career was crucified but I'm still alive
Sky scraper spaceships, wide crater dry lake beds
"resistance is futile" they said
I bear clutch the pen, my girlfriends jealous again
So intimate when I write it's a sin, 200
My electromagnetic rap flytrap
There's no way Earth you can get around that
This is a no brainer, stop the complaining
If Hip Hop is dead I'm here to save it
Pages upon pages everything I've created
The bar was below basic, I had to raise it
I did it for my Fathers, I did it for my Mothers and my Brothers
I did it for the world to discover
My poetry is peaceful, aggressive but regal
Progressive to the people, I hope the words reach you 210
Dr. Watson and Crick found an 3rd strand in the DNA helix
So your not what you think
Metronome Man will never take commands from the drum
The beat is my slave and it will behave as I want
Cheers! I spill beer on my bear skin chairs
I shed tears I loved Hip Hop all these years
Poet Laureate Infinity
I WILL FOREVER BE THE ILLEST LYRICALLY!

Poet Laureate Infinity
Poet Laureate Infinity
Poet Laureate Infinity
THIS NEVER BEEN DONE BEFORE IN HISTORY!

[Vocal 4: Canibus]
Nobody do it better, there ain't a truer Ripper
I did this separate imagine what we could do together
Inspired by GOD, inspired by the suffering
Was it done by a prophet? It must of been, who was it then
Rip The Jacker, hot but cold blooded
Many utter the name but very few love him
33 is the number that enlightens the Brothers
Insight to the fullest, that could brighten the dullest
The ramifications are awesome, what should we call it?
I call it my unacknowledged special access project
My skull is a submarine hull
In a cave below ground with a painting of Cthulhu on the wall
Necronomicon grimoires, open the doors
The vortex that reaches from here to beyond,10
The power to control thoughts however remotely
Through a term I'd like to call "Pulse Detonation Poetry"
The results from SETI, very interesting
I briefed the committee they told me to stop the testing
My team was credited, we turned over the evidence
But not before I could leverage it, for promotion to President
Cover me, 8 point sighting device for the eyes
FIRE!!! Transition if you go dry
Close your eyes, ritualize, spit your rhymes
Without trying you can shift your mind
Canibus altered the sequence nucleotides
Neuropetides only get high off mature Wine
Start timing, Atomic Clock keeps time perfectly, 20
Mrs. Guutoff my band teacher always would work me
Polyester pants, big fat ass
I loved that woman so much, I paid attention in class
My Spanish teacher Mrs Booker had an ass too
Why am I talking about this to you?
One day this will be known for now I must wait
I still love them both, and I never forget a face
At the time I used my Beta waves more than my Theta waves
Then there was greater way I learned at a later date
The rate of learning began burgeoning and wouldn't let up, 30
Mommy noticed my vocabulary I developed
Telencephalon olfactory lobes I had to practice
When a woman has her period I smell it on the mattress
It got to be difficult for any woman to live with me
I know my history, but what could that mean specifically?
The story of Bruce Lee, I died in my sleep
I was weak, it happens with every girl that I meet
A Clairvoyant Technique
Using X-Ray refraction, Not only can I see into the future
I can see past it, 40
But I don't know what it means I pass the DataStream along to my team
They say it's more than a dream
Killing caused by poisonous vapours, Lasers, Tasers, Masers
Electromagnetic Scalars
"That is not dead which can eternally lie
And with strange aeons even death may die"
Listen to the rhymes, the rhymes equal pie
If I had a piece of the pie I could buy Dubai
Rip The Jacker was born, the bow was drawn
Spit a 100 bars before you could run 100 yards, 50
I seen a mushroom to the north, from my porch
It was odd, every dog in the neighbourhood barked
You wanna stand there and talk?
The blast wave gonna' tear more than your roof off, nigga C'mon!
It is my understanding, that when I'm high I'm channelling
But when I'm out with the family I am animal handling
Observe a man who has a third DNA strand
Or a 5th or a 6th, this is way more advanced
I remove the veil from in front of me, suddenly
The roots of my discovery uncovered skulduggery, 60
I am not innocent, but you cannot punish me
Cause I know what the world wants to see, tragedy
What is Germaine determined to ascertain for his self?
Few of the same elk have known what I felt
There's a Proverb that goes "One should know thyself"
Before one can know the world so I showed myself
The unidentified submersible, looked like a giant turtle half circle
Yo, I need to stop smoking purple
Requested selected elected, but that's only impressive to the experts
Who know how to manipulate my message, 70
You lazy and you wanna be the best? I repeat
Don't talk about consciousness when you are consciousless and weak
If I die and YOU happen to wake up, I'm still alive
Please explain my complete life story to my children
Photo stills of the cryospill
Solarized film revealed there was a biofield
Fuck a record deal, my training is real
Look at the sword I wield, you will taste my steel
Phase I, sign the MOU, pursue more voters
There's three more phases that I think you should know, 80
Phase II, build the force, Phase III, sustain Ops
Phase IV, transition of Border Patrol Cops
Do, Re, Mi, Fa, Sol, La, Si-Do
These are the tones that will activate the ohms
No telling if it will bring out the best or the worst in you
It would be a miracle if I was merciful
Are you food for the moon? Or are you in the mood for doom?
Furniture moves when I walk into a room
STRYKER BRIGADE Driver, sometimes I was GUNNER
Check points required all the concentration I could muster, 90
Special Weapons And Tactics, Professional Assassin
I don't know what he does for a living ask him
I kneel before Congress and beg for money
Submitting specifics about the operation I'm running
You gotta' love it, what was it called? The G8 Summit
"Never heard of it", no details are public
The relative radiance of the rhyme makes it shine
Increasing the star wattage with longer cycle time
Yeah, I bust the rhymes but I customize the lines
And by the looks of things I did it just in time, 100
I marched from the Halls of Montezuma to Tripoli
Physically this mission objective is killing me
I submit to the will of the creator willingly
The possibilities present a probable infinity
I looked into LL's eyes we both cried
Meteors immediately fell from the skies
I've apologized but I can't change who I am
I can change future, can't budge the past
Them pretty ass lyrics is for bitches with acrylic
Only fake niggas catch feelings over silly shit, 110
SPORTS locked and loaded, zero you in from the pillbox
Williams! How many kills you got?
The uniforms match so we all look the same from the sky
They only time they notice the difference is when we die
Is dying a wise thing? What about trying?
What about our family members back home crying?
Man made weapons Star Ship Captain etc
George Lucas showed me a full size replica
We circled for a fly over in a black KIOWA
5 soldiers including me and a pilot called Noah
He passed over a top secret dossier folder half opened, 120
I noticed the words MOSES and CONUS
MOSES is a new weapon system secret code
CONUS is the continent of the US, I suppose
The jump light lit up, Master Chief said "Let's Go!"
All right men this is what we train for
Williams you gotta go first, "if you say so, HALO", High Altitude Stay Low
Gale Winds blowing, this might be the death of me
The AIRBORNE unit in the back of me jumped out next to me
Gold chords from the organ cut down your swordsman
Tell everybody to shut the fuck up when I'm talking, 130
[Not in current version: fuel mix rich, human hydrogen slush
The rhymes are too Christ Complex like for them,]
The 1000 Bar race at an unrelenting pace
Just in case Humans ever get to World War 8
Do you believe in fate? Then how do you know?
When you finally get there, where will you go?
This ain't no joke, you think I'm joking
Everything frozen, melted, destroyed, broken
Only the chosen find a way out
Everybody move out! Stay off the main route, 140
Satellites watch me they think they got me
Right hands turn left shoulders around but it's not me
Atmospheric Re-entry a flying sighting, looked like lightening
Striking blind, what it struck was frying
Comparative image sharpness between all artists
I don't think you know what you're about to get involved in
I'll give a quadrillion dollars to be a partner
If you are still worshipping money, you are Godless
Sulphuric Nitric Acid eats through the Labyrinth
The foundation is cracking, we must take action, 150
Basic Instruction Before Leaving Earth B.I.B.L.E
I take shelter in an old Missile Silo
Hip Hop is blackened pot placed next to a kettle
With my logo in it, a rigid rehomogenized metal
Millions of you are unfamiliar with what I'm saying?
Discuss it with your Chemistry Professor he will praise it
Tri Quad Quintangulate where did the signal originated?
Try to find out more information
The internal atheist outside the MATRIX
Sophia Stewart offered me a pill and said "take this", 160
She asked me if I was followed, I told her I wasn't
I didn't know the spy that sold me out would be my own cousin
"A populace uniformed is a populace of slaves"
Washington didn't say it quite that way
But it's something like that, you get the point I'm assuming
Poet Laureate Exclusive New Shit!
The message said "We should meet somewhere clandestine"
Professor keep heading East to the Best Western
Do not loose your bearings, keep checking your direction
"Start Session point 666 arc seconds" 170
The budget is huge, I have doubts about spending it
Concerning Cyclotronic Resonance, patents are pending it
Canibus aka "The Spitzberg Beast"
Gave his Bicentennial Speech on Emerald Peak
You'll need a first aid kit for the verse I spit
I am cautiously meticulous but artfully brisk
A change is beginning every molecule is spinning
Lyrics imitate the art, art imitates lyrics, can you hear it?
Signals bounce back and forth like a mirror
With flawless error, like that forever
Surface the air radar tells me where they are, 180
Are they far? I patiently watch the sweep arm
We can find them but they can't find us
Just below Mach 3 the rhymes ionizes
I'm hooked on Hip Hop, I can't live without it
You can mix this song a thousand ways I don't doubt it
The daughters of man locked in prison camps
With the sons of mothers that are too weak to dance
At least we notice damage, what do we expect
The coming super storm is gonna wipe us off the map 190
But that is not possible, that's sounds completely illogical
You must've been kicked the fuck out of school
Always remember the Reptilian agenda
"No Pulse Rendered" in the earthquake's epicentre
I found fluoride in my water supply
At the time I felt a total apathy towards dying
The ungrateful dead reoccurring images playing in my head
I was told to memorize what I was said
"With this salt I consecrate this water
May whatever it touch receive Hallowed LIGHT from THEM"
"With this sacred water I consecrate this Talisman so that 200
It will make ME POET LAUREATE" otherwise I'll be so depressed, oh well no
Regrets, I been toe to toe with the best, I KNOW the LEDGE
I accept all cultures colours creeds and races
Life is Life no taxonomical classification
No corruption no disruption no destruction no budget no nothing
It's never that easy you just gotta trust it
A leader I feel beleaguered to teach the truth
The Youth will refuse to follow if they don't believe you, 210
There is strength in numbers there are numbers in strength
Nothing good comes from hatred, Love's the missing link
Even if I am in a minority of one
The truth is still the truth no matter how it's spun
My mind is prepared, Hip Hop is impaired
If you disagree with me then yours isn't there

[Vocal 5]
I rock rhymes for your pleasure, you listen at your leisure
I only record it once you listen to it forever
The fish hook stuck in your jaws, the feedback was not positive
Human Hominids fishing for compliments
Started with a nugget, the budget snowballed into something
Above ground running not underground covered
Breath easy, regulate the pace see if they love it
The Poet Laureate puppet with a message from "THE OTHERS"
The aura describes the forces
I'm too involved to divorce it, my internal compass points me northward
My skull is a submarine hull, calling whales with whale song
Creating basketball size hailstorms
Water World under water war protected by the Jericho wall
With surface permutation of the permafrost
My war birds are grounded, their wings have been burned off
I'm not concerned though, it's only the first lost,10
Poetry Poetry Poetry Poetry Poetry
Poet Laureate infinity now you know it's me
Yeti riding a Triceratops with Elephant netting
Attending Black Widow weddings dressing in gossamer webbing
Pretending, experimenting, they call me a heretic
A derelict cherubim seraphim protecting America
Height, weight, eye colour, skeletal structure was designed
I circle my flight instructors in the skies as they fly
22 times, to show them I have plenty new rhymes
Poet Laureate will prove it to you all in due time
Don't be upset with Canibus yet, the kid just want respect
You been a success but what do he get?
Politics and Perjury bring out the worst in me, 20
But I don't take it personally, even though it's hurting me
The key maker turns the key, those observing me keep cursing me
They aren't worthy of a word from me
I spit the truth Rip the mic Rip the booth Rip you too
Rip the Jacker is proof I Ripped through
It drives me insane when a woman wears lace
The current gene structure is 46 pair based
Her heart rumbling and thundering like Captain Nicole Malachowski from an
Airbase, on a clear day
Ok I'm a pervert, It's time to fess up, 30
I might be looking for a leg up, but I won't touch
Closet sadomasochist sexual pacifist
I like to role play but I only play masculine
Victory over injury a victim to misery
The myriad of my metaphors make me a mystical mystery
I'm a giant in the industry just over 5 ft
Even my photo ID don't look like me
[The adverse disparity conflicts with clarity,]
The NASA contractor with a satchel of answers
I passed up the Nobel Peace Prize for my passion, 40
Democracy Rules Everything Around Me, D.R.E.A.M
Another fucking acronym, just what I need
Killing me with phrases that were designed to put me into dazes
As worthless as my junk mail is
"That is not dead which can eternally lie
And with strange aeons even death may die"
The Squid Faced God is difficult to describe
Those of weak heart and mind shouldn't even try
In a town near Kadam and Kakrak Jahlalabad
I pray in a hut constructed from Sago Palm, 50
Astoria Oregon Fisherman Poets got lost
Looking for Paradise, it only exists in the heart
Cause emotion manifests Thought, Thought manifests Words Actions and
Reality
But what is attracting me?
The overseer of poetic antiquity
The Victoria and Albert Museum kept them for me
Pythagoras, Dionysus, Loki and Pan
They have enlightened me thru song to understand
The multiplex meshing multiple messages is too much for me
Truly there is too much to see, 60
I'll mix one for you, then one for me
I'll mix some for the street, mix 'til my thumbs bleed
A stationary pulley drawing from a wishing well
The Genie gave me more than three because I listen well
Conflicted and confused but completely compelled
To celebrate my birthday alone in the year 2012
I hope I am not alone, that would be terrible
If I am celebrating then that would be a miracle
In a newly ordered world living in shit
No matter how good or poor your English is, 70
You lazy and you wanna be the best? You crazy!
Poet Laureate is reserved for the name G
E-r-m-a-i-n-e, Will I am, the name that my mother gave me
The world came to know me as Sir William
The man of steel with a Smallville build with the illest
Some of my thoughts align with Einstein himself
I wanna know God's thoughts too, the rest are details
Lyrical Fitness is no secret of course but
The secret to creativity is hiding your sources
Preserve the sanctity of the Soldiers in IRAQ, 80
Do not blame them and hold their humanity hostage
Pray for the families that want them home
Pray for the families abroad that have lost their homes
Who have lost their faith, who have lost their hope
Who have lost their point, who have lost their own
Yo! calm the fuck down, I shouldn't have to curse at you
Hydrate as much as possible, drink a lot of juice
Fucking bummer, no armour inside the Hummer
Gotta hug a motherfucking sandbag for cover, 90
Now I'm self employed, still gotta pay taxes
Cashless, bankrupt, ain't got no assets
From the gutter to the gallows no media coverage
Cause I don't want it, that's why I'm rarely seen in public
President Poetry, the popular obedient Pundit
That's right, you can take this job and shove it
I dictate a scribe that causes the court stenographer to die
Brewing hot tea with honey and lime
How is my driving? Run you off the road smiling
1-800-RoadRage, Start dialling, 100
The snake will grow feet and stampede you to your defeat
You are weak, you lied to us all in your speech
Symbiotic indeed, the host bleeds
Parasites attach to feed fulfilling antiquated needs
Rock climbed the slope shaped like a stop sign
In record clock time, Hot Lava lock rhymes rock slide topside
How does one ever really perfect such a craft?
You're obliged by your curiosity to ask
Cubism and Futurism writing amusing lyrics
My opinion of your opinion is you can't be serious, 110
Test driving my principle findings
By designing a new style of rhyming you can take home and try out
A 100 Bars per hour sometimes I doubled the writing secret signature timing
Was the hardest part to figure out
Agonizing, the pain of the migraine biting my brain
And everything inside it I can't explain but I'm trying
I heard this before, I can't remember who said it
We hear from 1000 to 20 thousand cycles per second
Straight out the freak show no pre show
Limited oxygen when I rhyme fast you breath slow
VFR stands for Visual Flight Rules by the Book, 120
You should know this even though it concern the showbiz
Because when in Rome........Walk as a Roman
Obviously you can see you've made the wrong choice
Fraternize but don't do it in the wrong tone of voice
A bad boy with bad toys made from new alloys
Readapted from a crashed asteroid
My shelter is not far, you can borrow what you need
The bunker doors sequestered beneath the tall tumble weeds
After the Matrix, Agent Smith continued his movement
The same bullshit, that humans are major pollutants, 130
Assemble the Gatlin gun, spin it see if it spun
Weapons check correct, I'm done - next one
My rap room is an 8 by 14 underground base
Hyper cube microphone booth in a vacuum of space
Extraterrestrial Isotopic ratios
A broke Scientist in his Lab with no place to go
All these conscious rappers ain't saying nothing
Matter fact they have no constituent function
Mix this record different, You'll hear me call names out
It's played out but there must be alternative routes, 140
The Geneva Protocol Advocates are so sloppy
A human being is not anybodies property
Reading body language in a Zero Gravity environment
Is much easier said than done, if your trying it
Attending the Opera with a Pompous Ego Monster
I can barely take my eyes off her big old knockers
Integrated in an existing clothing ensemble
My Saratoga Suit is Military Garment
The Quarantine Isolation Unit is where I house it
My team and I salvage the work of Dr. Fritz Albert, 150
If the prototype works, there's no telling what I will do
I'll have to get a new Plane a new Pilot and a Crew
Creatively I have never been to this level
First I'll put you in a sideways 8, then a pretzel
Password please have patience verification
I repeat, "What's Your Character String Verification?"
Infrared spectral observation from the Space Station
Before you take a break, I'll need you to list and name them
Dock the Kliper Craft at the preliminary designation
Tracing the Detection of Submicron Radiation, 160
Do not leave the Orbital Boom Sensor System running
I heard something called nothing that the Cosmonauts were coming
The rhymes are in place, General George Case
And Peter Pace said we had absolutely no time to waste
Next time we meet this whole song will be a new mix
For all the Rippers out there who need a new fix
My Father is Jamaican, My Mother is British
Raised to be civic, in the household we spoke Yiddish
ELF 100 cps, Elephant Hearing
I'm heading for the clearing, Storm Clouds appearing, 170
On the back of an Elephant with advanced intelligence
Like Nikola Tesla, shit!, damn that's a smart Elephant
Cease fire breach, riot and loot for 3 weeks, don't you see
Broke niggas never promote peace
Susan Malveaux will interview the polygamist Mr. Bis
Undisclosed in his home by the cliffs
I rip shit consistent spit persistent
The sickness, spit with conviction, promote lyrical fitness
I'm lost...... What version is this?
Mozart with a flowchart putting together parts of an unknown art, 180
But coming from my own heart
Burning a disk, initializing, rhyming and visualizing
Reaching 1000 Bars and climbing
Martial Law Research, an all expense paid trip to the dirt
Several miles deep underneath the Earth
The Boston Visionary Cell designed my new Lab
Paul Laffoley engineered a magnificent draft
Extraordinary men, who meet to review and recommend
I attend the Gubernatorial that never ends, 190
We just got a SASO, we call this one the Black Hole
I'm glad I'm the last to go
Zionism the answer to your uncensored question
Guy de Rothschild and his bloodline brethren
Playing the guitar singing folk songs, speaking my mind
Nobody could really understand the reason I rhyme
Infrared direct hit, target bled, proceed to inject the syringe with meds
That subsequently pinch your leg
You feel like your an inch from being dead
But you alive instead, you're really dead your just living in my head,200
Fire for effect, smoke out then rest
Give me a wedge formation, roll out like this
I will spare no sin, walk in with a scarecrow grin, looking crazy
Cause that's what you made me
Classified payloads with no frequency safe modes, no safety
And I still made time for the ladies
Ceiling visibility unlimited
A lyricist river fish surrounded by nigga shrimp
I'm a killer pimp
Somebody Hip Hop don't need me
Nigga I grew up in D.C., I love Lil' Weezy, 210
Me and Baby got the same name
We probably got the same blood in our veins, liquid propane
At the top of the Temple Mount Mosque I look at the Sun
I just have a few words for everyone
Everybody bow your heads and say this prayer
From this moment HIP HOP IS UNITED EVERYWHERE
Poet Laureate Infinity
I WILL FOREVER BE THE ILLEST LYRICALLY!

Poet Laureate Infinity
Poet Laureate Infinity
Poet Laureate Infinity
THIS NEVER BEEN DONE BEFORE IN HISTORY![Intro — James Dickey sample]
Uhh… I don’t understand how a writer would ever get writer’s block, so-called. My problem is having too much, and being unable to get it down

Yo, why is the Ripper so ill?
That would be a unpardonable breach of confidence for me to reveal
He said "One of these days, all eyes would be on me
When they look up in the sky and see the neon C"
Rhymes inscribed on a nickel disk encased
In glass with an ion beam for longevity
For more then 10 centuries, impressions and memories
The first time machine inventor will mention me
Canibus was a visionary indeed
He believed light could travel in multiples of C
The organic supercomputer that solved the mysteries
Of Klein Kaluza with two blue metric rulers
Liked Cool J, but thought Stephen Jay Gould was cooler
And he never liked to propagate rumors
Smoked Canary Island cigars
Liked American luxury cars and beautiful Asian broads
He had a strong mind, he used to philosophize
About rhymes while he was pruning his bonsai
He claimed that he had written the greatest rhyme of all time
But he would never take it out his archives
He wrote 2 songs per day
And was constantly experimenting with his wordplay
In his youth he did a report on the Sloan Digital Sky Survey
He got an F but he deserved an A
I followed his career from the first day
It seemed a lack of support contributed to his inert ways
I seen him pull in 24 hour workdays
With deferred pay, undeterred by the word "shame"
Public humiliation was the worst pain
He was spinning out of control like a class 5 hurricane
He said he wouldn't want another MC to suffer the same
Especially when there's nothing to gain
He was the illest alive but nobody would face it
He spit until his tongue was too torched to taste it
Properly funded corporations carbon dated his latest creations
To extract the information
They found it utterly amazing
They claimed the body of his work was the same thing as a priceless painting
Never mattered to him that art galleries hated him
Cause Thomas Kinkade called and said he would take 10
Complete enigmas wrapped in puzzles encrypted in language
With sound but without shape or signature
Kept files in his garage on MS-DOS
In a fire-proof pod, he thought it was odd
Outside there was a shed with an Oppenheimer lock
He apparently kept more wax then Madame Tussaud's
We were in total awe, cause it blew our minds
So many rhymes that were intricately designed
He was Poet Laureate of his time
And if you don't mind, I'd like to share some of his rhymes
Alone in my room, looking through the 32X telescope zoom
Adjusting the focus of the moon
One should not assume the philosophy of David Hume
Is nothing more then a subjective conclusion
What is the maximum field rate application?
The runaway glaciation surrounding the ocean basin
Affects the population fluctuation
On a continuous basis but that's just the basics
The juxtaposition of Canibus's position
The precision of something no other has written
Way above and beyond what was intended
The unparalleled malleable enunciation of a sentence
You didn't go to college obviously
I can tell by your ungodly unintelligible terminology
A remarkable odyssey, the rhymes of modern speeds
When the brain orders the body not to breathe
Your competency is not up to speed, you're not in my league
You couldn't possibly be hotter then me
Or oppositely your minus 25 degrees, you'd squeeze
But the condensation makes rifle barrels freeze
Allow me to speak figuratively, nigga please
My intellectual properties are about the size of Greece
Your counselor advised you not to speak
My counselor advised me to keep rhyming until they stopped the beat
In the words of Joseph Heller, "I learned how to write better"
Even though it sort of irked me
He said he didn't understand the process of the imagination
But he felt he was at its mercy
Which explains my point perfectly and certainly reinforces
The reason why nobody's probably ever heard of me
Couldn't understand what I mean by ill
Unless you try to translate what I print to film
This is the line of will, the circle of time
The cycle of eternity, the emergence of 1 line
Academic phonetics render critics tongue-tied
I've personified dry humor of cum laude alumni
A wise man sees failure as progress
A fool divorces his knowledge and misses the logic
And loses his soul in the process
Obsessed with nonsense with a caricature that has no content
My style is masterful, multilateral
I could battle a fool and be naturally cruel
Words of scorn are a disastrous tool
From an existentialist's view I'm a better rapper then you
Grab the mic and rip your physical fabric in 2
My attitude is fucked up but admirable
Different methods interpreted into different forms
From entirely different perceptions and seen from different norms
Not to spit in the palm there's much more involved
There's much more pieces of the puzzle for you to solve
48 orders of mechanical laws
And rays of creational cause, enhance the cadence of my bars
Maybe I am self-absorbed
But that's the effect, to find the cause you should ask my A&R
Today is what it is, but only because yesterday was what it was
Permitting you heard of Beezlebub
A tale of demons and drugs, pissy drunk in the club
With the DJ doing the needle rub
Chances are you'll never see me son
Yeah I know my name's Canibus but I can't help you if you need a dub
I came to holla at some big booty bitches
And listen to the speakers thump, where you get conceited from?
I'm so nice on the mic, they want to beat me up
Its deep as fuck, I ain't seen it all but I've seen enough
Really unbelievable stuff
There's a lot of times when I want to speak but I'm stuck
I should leave this rap shit alone
And kick my incredible rhymes in the privacy of my own home
My imagination is my own
The liberty to speak to freely lyrically on the microphone
With a pen in my hand, I bring motion to the angiogram
And become "Cani-millenia man"
Engrave my back with the emperor's stamp
Been spitting scientific rap since the 17th century began
Trying to escape the wicked empire of Def Jam
And the land where lyrics are bland and heretics hang
Every warrior has an axe to bury
But he has to learn to discern between enemy and adversary
I said to myself, "Germaine this is insane
It's suicide its controlled flight into terrain"
I fought to regain control of the plain, but went up in a ball of flames
And got banned from the hip-hop hall of fame
For two bars I kept hearing in my head
Over and over again, it cost me everything
I'm convinced now that more than the truth is at stake
Where people create language that pretends to communicate
Euphemisms are misunderstood as mistakes
But its a bi-product of the ghetto music we make
From an extroverted point of view I think its too late
Hip Hop has never been the same since '88
Since it became a lucrative profession
There's a misconception that a movement in any direction is progression
Even though the potency of it lessens
Big money industries writing checks to suppress the question
And nobody gives a fuck no more, no one goes to the book store
Ever since the confluence of Moore's Law
But I stay in the lab like Niels Bohr
His son Aage, Edward Lawrence, and Leo Szilard
Lyrically I take rap music and turn the knob
To the right full throttle and added panache
Why would I argue with my own conscience over the truth?
That's like me telling myself "don't tell me what to do"
Dialysis and analyses of battle MC's
Sometimes I say things I myself can't believe
My lyrical is so skillfully elliptical
I can understand how it makes you miserable
You wonder why I never let you play your beats for me
Or why I keep my studio enshrouded in secrecy
You wonder whats my infatuation with Alicia Keys
"Canibus why don't you speak to me?"
Yo, I meant it when I said no one can shine on a song that features me
That's why I said it so vehemently
You need to replace the hate with respect
I'm probably the best yet, Poet Laureate

[Outro — James Dickey sample]
Generally I take… I go with tha given, ya know, with what comes ta me over, tha celestial wireless…whenever it comes. You’re lucky when you get it[Intro]
[LL Cool J] Make it butter
[Redman] I'm gonna Bankhead bounce
[LL Cool J] No doubt
[Redman] Aiyyo watch your mouth
[Redman] Aiyyo, one two three four five six seven, blaze the hot
[LL Cool J] Trizack that sound like heaven
Seven six five four three two one
C'mon, Meth-Tical, come and get some

[Verse 1: Method Man]
Playing my position, hot Nick, son
This one, for all the sick ones, infliction
Poisonous darts sickening, best believe
Finger itchin' with two broke legs, now I'm trippin'
On MC's cliche, shot that ricochets
Start trouble bust bubbles, hip to wicked ways
Gotta love me, G-O-D, no one above me
Look good but fuck ugly
Tap your jaw from my Punch Buggy sunning you
Got you shittin in your last Huggie, running who
Fuckin punk, get a speed bump coming through
A single shot make yo meat lump, respect Wu

[Verse 2: Redman]
Aiyo I put it on a nigga, shitted on a nigga
Turn a Christian to a certified sinner
The bomb I release, time pent up (explodes)
While you got sent up I was hitting your ex ho
Shit I kept low, petro' your metro
Politic, keep the chickenheads gobblin
Shit I'm driving in, come with funk halogen
Terrorize your city, from the spliff committee
Kick ass till both Timberlands turn shitty
Gritty, smack the driver's head in the gypsy
When I approach rappers be taking notes
I drop like I shoulda invented the raincoat
Absolute, I love to burn to the roots
I keep comin til your pour sperm from your boots
Vigilante hardcore to the penis
Tell you fuck you my attitude is anemic

[Verse 3: Canibus]
I'm the illest nigga alive, watch me prove it
I snatch your crown witcha head still attached to it
Canibus is the type who'll fight for mics
Beatin niggas to death and beating dead niggas to life
When you look at me long enough, I start to read your thoughts
If the signal was strong enough, and then I'll call your bluff
Like, "Yo, how many rhymes you got?" I think I'll go on
For more Milleniums than Mazda's got on the car lot
And there's nowhere to run ta, when I confront ya
Nigga, I call your bluff like you had a phone number
Who wanna see Canibus get wild, who wanna act fly and
Get shot down with a surface-to-air missile
I take em on in all shapes sizes and forms and spit on
Anybody who ain't close enough to shit on
Zero to sixty? I'm already doin a hundred
When I'm blunted and I give it to any nigga that want it

[Verse 4: DMX]
Stay out the dark, cause if I catch you when the sun is down
Run it clown, come up off that, or I'm gon' gun it down
When in doubt, however skull goes, it's gon' be that
See that, that shit'll finish you dawg, believe that
Where we at, do you value your life, as much as your possessions
Don't be a stupid nigga - learn a lesson
I'm gon' get you either way, and it's better to live
Let me get what's between your sock, cause it's, better to give
Than receive, believe what I say when I tell you
Don't make me put you somewhere where nobody'll smell you
And when the lights is out, they don't come back on
This ain't a flick you ain't gon' come back on
You ain't that strong
You knew it was wrong, but you asked for it baby
You'se a pink nigga, ski mask for it baby
So I can hit you up on Front Street, you think I'm sweet
Want heat, one deep, leave him behind, front seat

[Hook]
Aiyyo, one, two, three, four, five, six, seven
Blaze the hot trizack, shine like heaven
Seven, six, five, four, three, two, one
Come on Mr. Smith, come get some

[Verse 5: LL Cool J]
When young sons fantasize of borrowing flows
Tell little shorty with the big mouth the bank is closed
The symbol on my arm is off limits to challengers
You hold the rusty swords, I swing the Excalibur
How dare you step up in my dimension
Your little ass should be somewhere cryin on detention
Watch your mouth better yet hold your tongue
I'ma do this shit for free this time this one's for fun
Blow you to pieces, leave you covered in feces
With one thesis ("LL Cool J is hard")
Every little boy wanna pick up the mic
And try to run with the big boys and live up to the real hype
But that's like picking up a ball, playing with Mike
Swingin at Ken Griffey or challenging Roy to a fight
Snapping, you amateur MC's
Don't you know I'm like the Dream Team touring overseas
For rappers in my circle I'm a deadly disease
Ringmaster, bringing a tiger cub to his knees
In the history of rap they've never seen such prominence
Your naive confidence gets crushed by my dominance
Now let's get back to this mic on my arm
If it ever left my side it'd transform into a time bomb
You don't wanna borrow that, you wanna idolize
And you don't wanna make me mad nigga you wanna socialize
And I'm daring every MC in the game
To play yourself out position, and mention my name
I make a rhyme for every syllable in your name
Go platinum for every time your grimy ass was on the train
Watch your mouth don't ever step out of line
LL Cool J nigga, greatest of all time[DJ Clue: with echo effect]
Fantastic Four: Cam'ron, Pun, Nore, Canibus

[Cam'Ron]
You never hear that we buckle; beef? We chuckle
Scuffle over a game of pinochle
Anything I put my money in, gotta see double
Unless y'all wanna see trouble
You realer now?
I'm the kind to cut a peace of soap, put it on the imbecile
Tell you it's crack, then hand a vial ?
Girls grope then I smile
That's when they fall cause they lick my balls
Right after I play ball
No wash-up, no nothin'. Hear what I say y'all?
O.K. y'all. Ask AJ y'all
I'll turn the baddest bitch gay y'all
Like Stacy Dash, she was eatin' Tracy ass
At this other lady's pad
To get it on I had to call up Desert Storm
My cut-throats scar y'all, while you hope the Don fall
But I'll come inside The Tunnel, nigga, wit Pope John Paul
Yo, them niggas on the wall frontin', they ain't no harm y'all
My crew'll break each shoulder
I'm that nigga they talk about on Street Soldiers
Cause my street soldiers are heat holders and weed rollers
Keep 2 bones and 2 phones in each Rover
We all relaxed and any beef we over-reactin
Peace is all we asking, but I get buck wild like Corey Jackson
Playin' is called off, cause y'all about to get hauled off
Y'all all soft from smokin Nicholi (/nicks), nigga, like Volkof
Know what I mean yo? Notice the cream grow
I fiend though, I'll come fuck up your whole town like El Nino
I'm the hottest nigga you've seen though
Jumpin outta Lex Coupe
With Jimmy Jones right next to me in the Benz Truck too

[Big Pun]
Fuck all y'all non-believers, I roll wit God, the squad and T.S
Out wit the BS; we platinum, they even doubted Jesus
Niggas is 85%, I'm 400 solid
Brain brolic with knowledge, cock-diesel scholars
Holdin it down, walkin around with gold by the pound
Frozen and drowned with diamond boulders all in the crown
Talk of the town, soakin you down with the toast 'til you drown
Ghost you and pound your corpse with a force that'll open the ground
Save the jokes for the clowns, I'm on a serious tip
You keep playin and I get furious quick
And now I take you for a walk through the ghetto
Either spark your metal or get outlined in chalk by the devil
I rep the borough that mothered this rap shit
I used to clap shit, now I just lay back and mack on some mack shit
I used to have to pack a mack in back of the Ac
Now I relax and stack platinum plaques in my shack
It's like that but don't think I won't counter act
My niggas is strapped and quick to lay a bitch on his back
I'm swift with the mack, quicker than Kung Fu
With the reflexes of a cat and the speed of a mongoose

[Noreaga]
Talk about huh? That's what we talk about thug shit

Now what's a symphony, without me on it, it ain't a symphony
My jewels shit on cats without Tiffany
N-O-R-E, I just lace the heat
I don't complain about the track, give me any beat
I get hed in the whip on any street
I fuck wit Clue, other cats is snakes
I've been fuckin' with Clue since he made 60 minute tapes
We copped mad bottles and crushed many grapes
We from the hood and they from the hood
The difference is we get plaques, they go double wood
Took the game right over at the time they could
Them niggas silly though, knowin' Nore lay pretty low
But them niggas is [ho]mos just like the Maxwell video
I got 2 albums and 2 cars
Now bitches on my dick cause of Chico DeBarge
Thugged Out's 1st lady (let's go half on a baby)
Ya motherfuckers ain't live, don't control the streets
I sold 163 thou on my 1st week
That means I got more fans than you
Bigger plans than you
We buy real coke, your grams is blue
Ayo, the President is like me, he smoke weed too
Don't really like to fuck, he just get head too
Stick a broom in your butt, tell you, "go head boo"
Thugged Out motherfuckers like the rest of the crew
Canibus, Cam'Ron and Punisher too
And the beats usually done by Duro and Clue

[Canibus]
Who the hell wanna battle, the ill mathematical?
My motherfuckin' brain is IBM compatible
Techniques are foreign, far from being boring
My style is hard like Castle without McCormick
I run through your crew like the flu when I bomb it
My styles like AIDS cause don't nobody want it
Niggas frontin' like they hard
But I'm a Street Fighter like Jean Claude
And I'll split your shit, par
Right down the middle
Play you like a fiddle
I got a fetish for titties, I nibble on the nipple
Then trespass on your property like Monopoly
Subdue your crew and beat that ass properly
Welcome to the Desert Storm annual extravaganza
Crew rolls deeper than the Cartwrights on Bonanza
I feed off weed, natural energy sources
Lyrics with more power than the horses they put in Porsches
Can't be tested or F'ed wit, I'm too reckless
I chop off heads just to take the necklace
The type of Canibus (/cannabis) that's side-effectless
The type of shit that get the Question-mark Man arrested
Take evasive action
Flip like reciprocal fractions
Turn the heat up on MCs to watch their meat blacken
You try to get fly, you get electrified and fried
And fuck around and get your mouth slapped dry
You could battle me and possibly survive
But you could never see me or walk away without a black eye
Word up hops, CLUEminat' call the cops
And if the cops ain't tryin' to see me, the cops call SWAT
Scar your whole squad with bullet scars
No holds barred
I'll even hassle the National Guard
Ready or not like the Fugees
Crews be steppin' to me
But I wipe em' all out like booty
I'm so unruly, the police don't say nothin' to me
It don't matter whether they on or off duty
I murder you brutally when I spit at you
My actions are unforgivable
Look at what CLUEminati did to you
The maximum lyrical, nigga you minimal
There's a big hole in the desert, I told the men in blue to dig for you

Motherfucker... CLUEminati ninety-eight

[DJ Clue: with echo effect]
DJ Clue... The ProfessionalYeah! That's the beat right there
I'm about to black out with 100 bars on some professional shit
So don't try this at home, yo

Yo, yo, yo
My style of rhymin' is ancient like Aztecs and Mayans
Because I recognize it's all about timing
Me and my freestyle alliance practicin' African voodoo science
In front of twenty feet bonfires lookin skyward
Calculating May 5, 2000 the nine planets'll be in alignment
The arrival of the prophet in the cockpit
Of a starship the size of the Hale-Bopp comet
With mercury ion rockets
And a big ass "Canibus Comin' Soon" poster on the side of it
I'm known geographically and intergalactically
That's why I got extraterrestrials that wanna battle me
They even tried kidnappin' me
And they would've snatched me
If their craft didn't get trapped in the Earth's gravity
Engines stalled and failed, crashed into a farmer's field
And that's really what caused Roswell
Undercover operatives workin' for COM 12
Disguised as a nigga, signed with a record deal
Lyrically I'm off-scale
So all hail or get tossed towards Hell, whatever y'all feel
Briusin' niggas, confusin' niggas like Chip Fu from the Fu-Schnickens
Hit you with nuclear cruiser missiles
Hear the wild wolf growl
Styles, stockpiled for miles from the ground to the clouds
Wack niggas wanna be down but it's not allowed
Interrupt the cipher unannounced and you'll get punched in the mouth
With the southpaw southern fist
I'll bust your shit, swell your lip bigger than Bubba shrimp
For acting tough and shit, what a wimp
You giant Goliath, niggas get shot with a rubber sling
I'm an experiment gone bad
My brainwaves on an encephalograph show that I'm stark ravin' mad
Your whole scientific staff'll get killed in a nuclear blast
When I throw the florence flask in my hand
Flammable liquids in the lab explode
And you get stabbed with all the flyin' glass
Trained to blow up commercial aircrafts
Trained in chemical weapons class
Just to see how long a nigga's breath'll last
I put him in a leather mask
Spray his ass with a can of pepper gas
Then watch him grab his neck and gag
Watch the nigga choke to death as I laugh
"You wanna battle?" is the type of question you should never ask
Nigga, pick a tougher task, see who the fuck'll last
Whoever lose'll get a solderin' iron up the ass
You need to recognize
My hand is quicker than the eye
Quicker than the five speed Jamiroquai drives
A lifespan longer than nine lives, infinite rhymes that can't die
A nigga with a divine mind
I dedicate this to the wise, dedicate it to dimes
Dividin myself into hundred ten times
You can't deny the offerin's I offer
Flows that glow with aurora's the sparkle like water
Fly like a saucer with the torque of a Porsche
Murder a million MC's, then autograph all of their coffins
Been gettin it on since I been born and I'mma live long
And I'mma be gettin it on 'till I'm gone
Look at all the stages I been on, all the songs that I spit on
I took an oath to rip everything I get on
A nigga like me should have Carpal Tunnel syndrome
In the wristbones from grippin microphones this long
I'm just a small fish in a big pond
And gets pissed off, whenever I gets picked on
Nigga try to flip and get flipped on
My army march a million strong
Like the Nation of Islam with suede Timbs on
Extremely hostile
Fully armed troops dressed in frog suits and night vision goggles
A lyrical lynch mobb
Shittin' on niggas drawn to a hideous form with horns and a mink on
Duckin' down low like we in 'Nam fightin' the Vietcong
Screamin "incomin" when I see a bomb
Speak to your leader, surrender your arms
You need about a million more soldiers to even the odds
Plus 800,000 to even consider a war
And 200,000 more to even look hard
You better drop your flag and withdraw
My cavalry charge accompanied by a blizzard of wicked metaphors
And smash y'all, attach y'all to the back of my horse
And drag y'all across the motherfuckin' asphalt
Nine out of ten niggas is frauds
You know who you are always talkin' about your bitches and your cars
Your jewelry and your girls, it's like we from two different worlds
You motherfuckers really get on my nerves
Cause I'm beyond them, on some futuristic cyborg shit
I close my eyes when I freestyle, so I could read what prints across them
Then raise my arms like a sorcerer and cast a fireball into the audience
To barbecue your brain organs
You feel like you've been thrown in a microwave oven
I flame broil suckers and hit 'em with some more shit
The raw shit. Call my reinforcements, the four horsemen
Take a big piece of chalk and draw a line across the stage pulpit
I dare a motherfucker to cross it
I'll even call my man Black Rob at two in the mornin'
Tell him it's important, tell him to call Sting three way and sing a chorus
Break your camcorders, so you motherfuckers can't record it
Call the news, I'll kill your reporters
Start a lawsuit, I'll kill your lawyers
Fuck the soft shit and fuck what y'all think
My album's gold cause my album was the bomb shit
Y'all niggas got your ass beat, cause you asked for it
Got your picture taken and put in a tabloid
Cause you a man and you like to touch little boys
You fuck 'em in the ass, then you give 'em cash for it
That's some sick shit homeboy
A hundred years ago they'd have took you to see Sigmund Freud
You fraudulent, feminine, fragile as a feather is
With an effortless blow, I'll crack your whole skeleton
You think you're better than Canibus, where's the evidence?
You got below average intelligence and poor penmanship
You need to shut the fuck up, cause your breath stink
Take fifty cents and purchase a pack of peppermints
Battlin' me, you never win
You thought you was the only nigga, that could sneak a weapon in
Nigga guess again
Cause after I'm finished wreckin' this shit
I'm a drink a whole bottle of Henney and go fuck a lesbian

 [Verse 1: Canibus]
My offense is a mixture of Mike and Muhammad
Knock a nigga unconscious and talk shit
In bare-knuckle boxing speed is the object
Weaving and dodging with defensive blocking
So in the ring, you cannot win
The top ten become nine dead if I ever decide to hop in
With the one-two, one-two shot to the chin
Knock you out like ten shots of vodka and gin
The beautiful blend of power and strength
From the top of my head, down to where my toe cuticles end
I verbally burn a nigga, lyrically hurt a nigga
Put a voodoo verse on a nigga, Kennedy curse a nigga
Who can spit the words quicker than the average man?
Who can embarrass a man? Bite you with fangs and mangle ya hands
On candid cam, the Canibus can
The Canibus can with the stamina to damage a man

[Hook]
It's been a long time, I shouldn't have left you
Without a strong rhyme to step to
I told y'all (C'mon!!) I roast y'all (C'mon!!)
So come on (Hold on) Hold on!!
It's been a long time, I shouldn't have left you
Without a strong rhyme to step to
I told y'all (C'mon!!) I roast y'all (C'mon!!)
So come on (Hold on) Hold on!!

[Verse 2: Canibus]
Yo! I spit for it (Rhyme for it!) Live for it (Die for it!)
Back out the nine, commit a homicide for it
If I'm handcuffed with the right to remain silent for it
I'ma blow trial and do the federal time for it
You mad at the last album, I apologize for it
Yo, I can't call it, motherfucking Wyclef spoiled it
But this time for '99 I got 5 on it
You should double up and put a dime on it
Matter of fact, triple your nickel and put 14.99 on it
I'ma shine on it, watch Flex drop the bomb on it
About ten times on it, watch people call a request line for it
Cipha Sounds keep pushing rewind on it
Look out for the album with the Canibus design on it
12 O'clock in the morning you'll be standing on line for it
I'm a live poet, with a sharp ear and eye for it
Cause I tear down mics and put a out of order sign on it

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Canibus]
Yo, I rip shit with the ballistic characteristics
Of a hollow tip at point blank distance
I flip shit when I spit shit, Father forgive Bis
I just snatched the Jesus piece off some Christians
Cause they sounded like idiots, they went from silver to gold to platinum
After the millennium they'll probably be wearing Iridium
They so gassed, if a bitch sucked they dick they'd probably cum helium
Y'all niggas can't be serious, I was nice before ice
Before Christ, before the words, "Let there be light"
And a light took over the night
I was born with a mic
Lord of the mic before all plant and animal life
Took this rap shit to new heights
Before the Wright brothers took flight
Before dog fightin' and aerial strikes
Before MC's picked up pens and started to write
Before promotional marketin and posterlights
The Can-I-Bus'll bust up mics
Punch out lights
Punch out your motherfuckin eyesight
For the title bout fight
Ask Ty Fyffe, I snatch the track for half price
The Canibus is too nice
Gimme that mic!

[Hook]Intro, [imitating the owl from the "Tootsie Pop" commercials]
One ... two ... three...
(Chomping sound) ... three!!

[Canibus]
Yo, in linear terms, my 33 degree and a 3rd
Words will give you 30 3rd degree burns
First I write 33 lines to a verse
About how I created the Earth out of 33 quirks
33 of my peers never thought it would work
For 33 days, I started my relentless research
And I figured, if Jigga could do, 22 2's
As an MC, then I could do 33 3's
Suddenly it occurred at 3:30 on March 3rd
It came to me like God's word
I started to load my .33 Caliber Mossberg
Went to the top of the Empire State on 33rd
33 gunshots was heard
33 pedestrians lay wounded or dead on the curb
33 squad cars rushed to the scene
As soon as they heard some madman had gone berserk
I demanded 33 million
Or I was going to kill 33 of the women and children in the building
I gave them 33 minutes to respond
Then I proceeded to arm a backpack nuclear bomb
I set the timer for 3 hours and 3 minutes long
Told them not to try nothing funny or I'd kill them all
They still never responded
Until I saw 33 of the S.W.A.T. team jump out of 3 helicopters
I told them for the 3rd and final time
If they crossed the line again, I'd take 33 lives
3 of the hostages started crying, 3 of them started wilding
And convinced 3 more to start an uprising
3 of them stood to their feet and started freestyling
I didn't know what to do, so I started rhyming
I tried to kick 300 bars
But I got picked off by a sniper from 33 yards
The bullet hit me but it got lodged and ricocheted off
3 organs 3 inches away from my heart
My name went down in history as the illest MC
Rewind it and count it, 33 3's[Intro]
[LL Cool J] Make it butter
[Redman] I'm gonna Bankhead bounce
[LL Cool J] No doubt
[Redman] Aiyyo watch your mouth
[Redman] Aiyyo, one two three four five six seven, blaze the hot
[LL Cool J] Trizack that sound like heaven
Seven six five four three two one
C'mon, Meth-Tical, come and get some

[Verse 1: Method Man]
Playing my position, hot Nick, son
This one, for all the sick ones, infliction
Poisonous darts sickening, best believe
Finger itchin' with two broke legs, now I'm trippin'
On MC's cliche, shot that ricochets
Start trouble bust bubbles, hip to wicked ways
Gotta love me, G-O-D, no one above me
Look good but fuck ugly
Tap your jaw from my Punch Buggy sunning you
Got you shittin in your last Huggie, running who
Fuckin punk, get a speed bump coming through
A single shot make yo meat lump, respect Wu

[Verse 2: Redman]
Aiyo I put it on a nigga, shitted on a nigga
Turn a Christian to a certified sinner
The bomb I release, time pent up (explodes)
While you got sent up I was hitting your ex ho
Shit I kept low, petro' your metro
Politic, keep the chickenheads gobblin
Shit I'm driving in, come with funk halogen
Terrorize your city, from the spliff committee
Kick ass till both Timberlands turn shitty
Gritty, smack the driver's head in the gypsy
When I approach rappers be taking notes
I drop like I shoulda invented the raincoat
Absolute, I love to burn to the roots
I keep comin til your pour sperm from your boots
Vigilante hardcore to the penis
Tell you fuck you my attitude is anemic

[Verse 3: Canibus]
I'm the illest nigga alive, watch me prove it
I snatch your crown witcha head still attached to it
Canibus is the type who'll fight for mics
Beatin niggas to death and beating dead niggas to life
When you look at me long enough, I start to read your thoughts
If the signal was strong enough, and then I'll call your bluff
Like, "Yo, how many rhymes you got?" I think I'll go on
For more Milleniums than Mazda's got on the car lot
And there's nowhere to run ta, when I confront ya
Nigga, I call your bluff like you had a phone number
Who wanna see Canibus get wild, who wanna act fly and
Get shot down with a surface-to-air missile
I take em on in all shapes sizes and forms and spit on
Anybody who ain't close enough to shit on
Zero to sixty? I'm already doin a hundred
When I'm blunted and I give it to any nigga that want it

[Verse 4: DMX]
Stay out the dark, cause if I catch you when the sun is down
Run it clown, come up off that, or I'm gon' gun it down
When in doubt, however skull goes, it's gon' be that
See that, that shit'll finish you dawg, believe that
Where we at, do you value your life, as much as your possessions
Don't be a stupid nigga - learn a lesson
I'm gon' get you either way, and it's better to live
Let me get what's between your sock, cause it's, better to give
Than receive, believe what I say when I tell you
Don't make me put you somewhere where nobody'll smell you
And when the lights is out, they don't come back on
This ain't a flick you ain't gon' come back on
You ain't that strong
You knew it was wrong, but you asked for it baby
You'se a pink nigga, ski mask for it baby
So I can hit you up on Front Street, you think I'm sweet
Want heat, one deep, leave him behind, front seat

[Hook]
Aiyyo, one, two, three, four, five, six, seven
Blaze the hot trizack, shine like heaven
Seven, six, five, four, three, two, one
Come on Mr. Smith, come get some

[Verse 5: LL Cool J]
When young sons fantasize of borrowing flows
Tell little shorty with the big mouth the bank is closed
The symbol on my arm is off limits to challengers
You hold the rusty swords, I swing the Excalibur
How dare you step up in my dimension
Your little ass should be somewhere cryin on detention
Watch your mouth better yet hold your tongue
I'ma do this shit for free this time this one's for fun
Blow you to pieces, leave you covered in feces
With one thesis ("LL Cool J is hard")
Every little boy wanna pick up the mic
And try to run with the big boys and live up to the real hype
But that's like picking up a ball, playing with Mike
Swingin at Ken Griffey or challenging Roy to a fight
Snapping, you amateur MC's
Don't you know I'm like the Dream Team touring overseas
For rappers in my circle I'm a deadly disease
Ringmaster, bringing a tiger cub to his knees
In the history of rap they've never seen such prominence
Your naive confidence gets crushed by my dominance
Now let's get back to this mic on my arm
If it ever left my side it'd transform into a time bomb
You don't wanna borrow that, you wanna idolize
And you don't wanna make me mad nigga you wanna socialize
And I'm daring every MC in the game
To play yourself out position, and mention my name
I make a rhyme for every syllable in your name
Go platinum for every time your grimy ass was on the train
Watch your mouth don't ever step out of line
LL Cool J nigga, greatest of all timeMethod, where the gods at? Redman, where the squad at?
Yo L, is that a mic on your arm? Let me borrow that
Who's the God of rap you saying is nice?
I'll beat a dead nigga to death and beat a dead nigga to life
If you look at me long enough, I'll start to read your thoughts if the signal was strong enough
And then I'll call your bluff
Let's see how many rhymes you got
I can go on for more Millenias than Mazdas got in a car lot
And there's nowhere to run to, when I confront ya
Nigga, I'll call your bluff like you had a phone number
Who wanna see Canibus get wild?
Who wanna act fly and get shot down with a surface-to-air missile?
I take them in all shapes, sizes, and forms, spit on
Any emcees who ain't close enough to shit on
Zero to 60? I'm already doing a hundred when I'm blunted
And I give it to any nigga that want it
Your head will spin so fast, you'll catch whiplash
I practice lyrical witchcraft on your bitch ass
Make your hard drive crash, the C colon backslash
And I'll go back to the booth to school your whack ass
Because the object of the game is to spark every cell in your brain
At degrees hotter than blue flames
Propane gas, it incinerate you into ashes
I got you breathin' harder than girls in Lamaze classes
Stop bitchin' about if it's written or freestyle
Got the whole Spanish community saying I'm muy mal
Charging niggas with booty styles 50 dollar fines
In addition to 25 dollars for whack punchlines
’Cause I'm the top dog running the yard
And I represent cause I never chained to the fence
Hence to battle me is impossible
I'll put your whole crew in the hospital with IVs all in their nostrils
Stop sleeping on me, I ain't a mattress
Put you through more drama than a soap opera actress
Don't even think about pulling out and opening fire
Gunshots wound but I remove bullets with pliers
I aspire to [?] that you've ever witnessed
From a far side, deceiver confusing the fat lip
Rhymes designed from lines of pure knowledge
I'll make your head nod 'til your neck runs out of cartilage
I think it's obvious that I can bring the ruckus
Scream on your crew like a military drill instructor
When I come through, niggas stand stiller than statues
If I have to, I'll battle your whole rap crew
Then I'll attack you with words that's absurd
And rip your fucking skin off just to get on your nerves[Intro: Canibus]
Yea, yea Can-I-Bus, Mic Club
(Nothing to Prove, it's all love)

[Canibus]
I bust through like Sputnik 2
This is man's best friend, whoopty-woo
The flag is black, red and blue
True shoot from the hoopty, dogs jump out of dooly
But it'll take more than that to move me
Like; wireless mics for tireless nights
Firefights inspire my life, why do I write?
Twenty year Hip Hop vet, they perceive me as a threat
They manifest beads of sweat
Examine the blood trail, squeeze trigger
Puss drips out of the thumbnails, I smell like gun shells
Polonium, pandemonium with a dose of unknownium
The Soviet Hugo Rodier
Fourth generation roper report
Everything I was taught bore resemblance to my thoughts
The truth and design of the Guggenheim rhyme
Where every line is weaponized then applied
Mob shit, talk it acquisition is sick
I don't miss when I twist the 556
Stand there with arms folded, firearms make me look large and bloated
("I'ma gonna have to project my voice")
Equipment check, church bells time
("Some of this stuff might get intense"), one more time
Just kill 'em 'Bus, ain't nobody around to witness nothing
Heavens devil strangle Hell's Angel with a mic cable
Then J Wells came through

[Sample from Nas @ the L.A. Listening Party on December 14th, 2006]
"Yo, the niggas that use to have a nigga a little nervous was like;
B.I.G., 'Pac, (Right), even Canibus, like Eminem them niggas use to have me like
If we go at it dawg we gotta go HARD!"

"Yo, the niggas that use to have a nigga a little nervous was like;
B.I.G., 'Pac, (Right), even Canibus, like Eminem them niggas use to have me like
If we go at it dawg we gotta go HARD!"

[Canibus]
Yea, yo
I support a secure change of custody
Don't trust the beat, trust me Canibus the MC
Without moving my neck I turn to the left
Yes I am the best you'll learn to respect
Till your death, Hip-Hop is the body, you are the chest
I am the vest, we are sworn to protect
This behavioural bomb rewritable radio songs
"What station is your radio on?"
My training is worth millions
Imam death squad rush the building
From the front line with Prince William
I am Prince William's exercise cover and concealment
Prohibit the media from filming
Never in the moment, always thinking of the Omen
I pause soldiers, nobody told them
Inoculate; I postulate not your weight
Drop to your face, the active component will not break
My Omanium friend tried to pay me in Yen
I threw the money in his face and said "Pay me again"
You wanna talk to the kid? Enter this ten digit grid
I'll explain to you what I did
702-386-5397, call, leave a message
Y'all niggas can't rap, so why you wanna go and do that?
You move the crowd, I move the map
The defying mad Lion, triumph over the rulers of Zion
Fuck your +Blood Diamonds+, I'd rather laugh dying
Miners in the mine shaft crying
'Apocalypto' from GITMO, I'll clash with the last Mayans
The Sun stone science, the black, red and blue alliance
Jump through the fire, you'd be a fool to try it
The fire suit don't fit, NO SHIT!
My Saratoga suit got a customized grip
With a batwing released for both wrist and both feet
Blazing high, but I don't feel no heat
Hip-Hop's master chief, "Here, have a seat"
In the mic booth where I hang slab the meat
Before, during, or after debrief
I'll crack your teeth, don't talk unless if asked to speak
The Rift Valley Fever symptoms could last for weeks
We call a hell in a cell, watch the bastard tweak
Reach 80° degrees North, 14° degrees East
Beneath the ice sheet lies the Spitsberg Beast
Transmission distorted, injuries reported
Mission aborted, follow your orders, move forward
BRAVO! I fell in love with you Suzanne Malveaux
On the down-low, now you know
She talked to the Canibus man
Code name: Javelin Fangz
With 'Nothing to Prove' to the rap fans
Could've elaborate further but suffice to say
"Goddamn that MV made my day"
He's a butcher, a baker, a vapour box maker from Jamaica
Still talking trash to the haters
I'll clash with the graders, this is major manual labour
Beta test the data with blue lasers
Canibus waving Alice, it's 'Nothing to Lose' in Los Angeles
Suing Hip-Hop for the damages
G-4's, 10.4's, still conscious but not for long
Missile lock-on; stop the song[Canibus]
Yo yo, I just appeared outta nowhere, 1980 was the year
Engineered as a biological weapon of warfare
Now with this I generate more fear
Even though back then nobody cared and people wasn't as scared
I never used to get so much attention
Most of the top contenders at the time I was good friends with
For instance, my man small pox was hot
He used to SoundScan ten thousand a week and that was a lot
That nigga Hepatitis B, he was hyper than me
He used to get between twelve and twenty thousand a week
Alcohol was the neighborhood star
Bubbling, drugs had niggas juggling
All kinds of controlled substances
My man cancer was like Charles Manson
Cigarettes almost made the Surgeon General ban them
Homicide was buggin' cause he had guns to amp him
And I was on the low lampin' cause I had a plan kid

Chorus: Canibus and Lisa Stone (repeat 2X)

AIDS is gold and HIV is platinum
Sit down, ask them where you get your facts from
Five hundred thousand niggas in the hood with it
And a million more niggas is gettin ready to get it

[Canibus]
Yo, yo, now that millions is dead I'm considered widespread
Number one on the top ten and considered a world wide threat
To all the kids, thirteen to twenty-three tryin
Sex, unsafe sex, you niggas need to use latex
H-I-V will progress to A-I-D-S
And transform your warm blooded bones to dry flesh
By stressing the immune system
Promiscuous men and women trying to avoid
Getting the micro-organism in them
From running up in it raw
Ready and willing, a couple of minutes of a good feeling
Is what'll kill them
Break ya body down in steps, breath for breath
In the hospital with less then a dozen T-cells left

Chorus

[Canibus]
Yo
I went from "Killing Them Softly" to killing them harshly
Minorities from twenty to forty can't afford to ignore me
They do my dirty work for me - going to
Raunchy ass parties where they be having orgies to transport me
Through the semen and blood, needles and drugs
Choose which one of the two demons in evil you trust
Cause the only way I could be detected
Is by getting tested and most people don't question
The person they having sex with
As to whether or not they infected
Even the people you already slept with
Wouldn't suspect that they can catch it
Forty percent of the AIDS patients is Afro-Americans
And we only twelve percent of the population
That statement is a fact, latinos and blacks face it
It came straight from the World Health Organization
It's the iron fist scientist, slash rhyme-chiatrist
Here to diagnose that we dying quick

Chorus 2X[Eminem sample from Tim Westwood interview]
"If you’re an MC and you mention my name in the wrong way
You draw first blood, I’m gonna come at you"

[Kuniva]
War Lab, call us haters all you want
Fuck it call me a hater, full blown instigator
Leavin niggas on intubators breathin like Darth Vader
I hate people that pack guns but they don't bust 'em
Or bitches that come back to my room but they ain't fuckin
Pistol clutching, the Dozen, you heard it don't get is misconstrued
Whatever we do'll hit the news once we get the tools

[Eminem samples]
You're an emcee and you mention my name
In the wrong way, and you draw first blood, I'm comin

[Canibus]
You pushed D-12 to the side to sign Voltron 5
If Proof was alive he'd be dyin' inside
You ain't no hip-hop messiah, you a bitch, 'cuz you dissed Mariah
Shit like that supposed to be private
I'mma fry you on behalf on Mariah and Michael
Put you back on them drugs, make you suicidal
You can't shut the record down, nigga it's viral
When you use the word 'nigga', just remember your idols

[DZK]
I got a question, I'm white, can I join D12?
I'll sell you four million records then I'll tell you go to hell
Leave Swifty in charge, then remove all the stars
And make the group wish Bizarre shot pool in a bar
An assault lawyer stop the beat, suing us all
I really do hope you know who get involved
Cause I'm a fan and I'll get you for a Nick Cannon dissin
And you already know how fuckin sick Canibus is

[Swifty]
I hate a bitch-ass nigga just as much as I hate fags
I love goin to war but I hate when they raise the flag
These niggas hittin the streets spittin venom on me
Then start renegin the beef, I hate peace treaties
Forever yo' enemy I increase beef as Amityville's finest
Cause I don't believe in stoppin violence
I'm a tyrant that'll snatch my respect and scram
I use a uzi cause I hate a Tec when it jams
I hate when dudes treat this like life a movie
Usin rap as his excuse to do shit and they only move ki's in the booth
I piss on niggas hands, whoever's grown, patches and tombstones
I hate 'em ass when I break into a home
I'm barefaced, I clap your cat, ramsack it
That's what I'm wearin black and I hate goin out the back
So call me a hater, walkin detonator, I ain't afraid
To stick this blade into your fade in front of spectators

[More Eminem dialogue]
You're an emcee, big small it doesn't matter
No matter how big I get, I just want people to know

[Canibus]
You the devil in a red dress on MTV
You sign more black people than a basketball team
What you trying to say subconsciously? You can't rock the beat like me
Consciously you know I rock you to sleep
Slim Shady you a coward 'cuz you scared to rap with me
The only black man you respect is 50
And the greatest of all time was dead right
You dead wrong, you shouldn't have even be on that song

[DZK]
He fell off so hard this faggot broke his accent
I'm flippin through the channels seein Bruno get his ass sniffed
And I'm disgusted man, what the fuck is wrong with you?
Why'd you date Mariah? Mariah's not a fuckin dude
You never even saw her nude and you busted two
Must have been thinkin 'bout your stepdad touchin you
But that ain't nothin new, I asked your ugly crew
They verified it, so bitch quit lyin

[Canibus]
I remember the first time we met, I ain't even liked you
Walkin' around my vido set like you was in high school
It must excite you seeing black people being tribal
That's why Dr. Dre signed you
I bet you right now you got a big rotten Rosenberg beside you
Trying to be just like your father, inside you
Your Stan android fanboys need to kill that noise
I know what you thinking... kill that boy

[DZK]
We leavin Elvis funny money makin pelvis shattered
Let's see you square dance now, let's see you hold your bladder
Let's see you fire back Em where's the fire at it?
Suicide hotline time, go dial that
Put on that "8 Mile" hat and write a vile track
Get at some people that can actually diss you back
No more target practice on retarded actors
And pop stars, Marshall you're not hard

[Eminem dialogue]
Whatever happens to me in this game
I've always got my ear to the street

[Canibus]
Rengade Schemenegade, you pink like lemonade
I've been better than you before Genesis was made
You ain't better than Black Thought, you ain't better than Mos Def
You ain't better than Canibus, Professor Griff Hotep
So renegade Schemenegade, you pink like lemonade
I penetrate through Hailey's Comet with metal blades
Yeah! You and I both know why I'm saying this
I hope Whoo Kid get fired for playing this

[Bizarre]
Get off, Nikolai Volkoff, mazeltov
Ready to show off, fo'-fo'll blow your do' off
Blowin off steam, goin off the beam
Let the 9 sing, bitch this ain't a dream
Bitch I'm the king, color me bad
Skinny jeans, what happened to the sag? You makin me mad
Y'all a bunch of JJ Fags, now who the fuck is bad?
Motherfucker I'm bad!
Call me a hater[Sample]
"Alright, we're 'bout to blast the hell out this"
"Here It comes"
"Holy"

[Eminem sample]
"But uh, like, honestly
I never even let him have it yet
You know, it's his little, whatever
Like, barely peaked my radar
You know
So, hopefully he'll do better than, like
Get my attention or whatever

[Swifty]
Call us haters all you want

[Kuniva]
Fuck it, call me a hater, full blown instigator
Leaving niggas on incubators breathing like Darth Vader
I hate people that pack guns but they don't bust them
Or bitches that come back to my room but they're not fucking
Piston clutching the dozen, you heard it, don't get it misconstrued
Whatever we do will hit the news once we get the tools

[Eminem sample]
"If you're an MC and you mention my name in the wrong way
You draw first blood, Im'ma come back"

[Canibus]
You pushed D-12 to the side to sign Voltron 5
If Proof was alive he'd be dying inside
You ain't no Hip Hop messiah, you a bitch 'cos you dissed Mariah
Shit like that is supposed to be private
I'mma fry you on behalf of Mariah and Michael
Put you back on them drugs, make you suicidal
You can't shut the record down, nigga its viral
When you use the word 'nigga', just remember your idols

[DZK]
I got a question, I'm white, can I join D12?
I'll sell you 4 million records then I tell you go to hell
Leave Swifty in charge and remove all the stars
And make the group wish Bizarre shot pool in the bar
Interscope lawyers 'bout to be suing us all
I really do hope you know who get involved
Cause I'm a fan and I'll get you for a Nick Cannon dissing
And you already know how fucking sick Canibus is

[Swifty]
I have a bitch ass nigga just as much as I hate fags
I love going to war but I hate when they raise the flag
These niggas hitting the streets, spitting venom on me
Then start reneging the beef, I hate peace treaties
Forever your enemy, I increase beef
[?]
Cause I don't believe in stopping violence
I'm a tyrant that will snatch my respect and scram
I use the uzi cause I hate the tec when it jams
I hate when fools treat this life like a movie
Using rap as an excuse to do shit
And they only move keys in the booth
[?], who's ever grown
[?] some tombstones, I hate them ass when I break into a home
[?]
And that's without wearing black and I hate going out the back
Well call me a hater, walking detonator, I ain't afraid
To kick this blade to your fade in front of spectators

[Eminem sample]
"You're an MC, big, small, it doesn't matter
No matter how big I get, I just want people to know"

[Canibus]
You the devil in a red dress on MTV
You sign more black people than a basketball team
What you trying to say subconsciously? You can't rock the beat like me
Consciously you know I rock you to sleep
Slim Shady you a coward 'cos you scared to rap with me
The only black man you respect is 50
And the Greatest Rapper Of All Time was dead right
You 'dead wrong' you shouldn't have even been on that song

[DZK]
He fell off so hard, this faggot broke his accent
I'm flipping through the channel seeing Bruno get his ass sniffed
And I'm disgusted man, what the fuck is wrong with you
Why'd you date Mariah? Mariah's not a fucking dude
You never even saw her nude and you busted too?
Must have been thinking 'bout your stepdad touching you
But that ain't nothing new, I asked your ugly crew
They verified it, so bitch, quit lying

[Canibus]
I remember the first time we met, I ain't even liked you
Walking around my video set like you was in high school
It must excite you seeing black people being tribal
That's why Dr. Dre signed you
I bet you right now you got a big rotten Rosenberg beside you
Trying to be just like your father, Inside you!
Your Stan android fanboys need to kill that noise
I know what you thinking...Kill that boy

[DZK]
We're leaving Elvis funny money making pelvis shattered
Let's see you square dance now, let's see you hold your bladder
Let's see you fire back Em, where's the fire at?
It's suicide hotline time, go dial that
Put on that 8 Mile hat and write a vile track
Get at some people that can actually diss you back
No more target practice on retarded actors
And popstars, Marshall, you're not hard

[Eminem sample x3]
"And whatever happen to me in this game, I always got my ears to the street"

[Sample]
"People who are listening
I have a conscience full of science and data
And evidence and analogies
And you know, [?] message
All that other stuff"

[Canibus]
Renegade Schmenegade you pink like lemonade
I've been better than you before Genesis was made
You ain't better than Black Thought, you ain't better than Mos Def
You ain't better than Canibus, Professor Griff Hotep
So renegade schmenegade you pink like lemonade
I penetrate through Hailey's Comet with metal blades
Yeah! You and I both know why I'm saying this
I hope Whoo Kid get fired for playing this!

[Bizarre]
Get off, Nikoli Volkoff, mazel tov
Ready to show off, four-four will blow your door off
[?]
[?], bitch, this ain't a dream
Bitch I'm the king, color me bad
Skinny jeans, whatever happened to the sag, you making me mad
Y'all bunch of J.J. fags, now who the fuck is bad?
Motherfucker, I'm bad
Call me a hater

[Sample]
"I'm kinda doing this deliberately cause I want to get a reaction from you"
"Well you want us to get him on? You two will go at it"
"Well that will take up the whole hour, we don't have a lot of time, so we can do it later"

[Sample]
"[?] niggas and they go tattle
It's hits like when Eminem and Canibus had a battle"

[Sample]
"But you can't invade me though"[Canibus]
Yo.. the shottie rip, perforate the skin on top of ya ribs
Red stuff come out his ribs like a Hollywood script
Bitch-niggas on the floor screamin for mommy and shit
Cardiologists hook up the heart monitors quick
Thermometer temperature dips below 76
That's what you get for tellin niggas that you better than 'Bis
Not possible - if I can't pronounce it, it ain't rhymable
The audible probability probably ain't probable
Supreme rap, G Rap, underground without a rule
Shopper proof, holdin hip-hop for hostage, bout to shoot
Helicopters stabilized at low altitudes
Talkin to the negotiator, layin out the rules
In a tight compromise salute, road-block with troops
Underwater's not to shoot, but they break ya vertebrae with boots
Ten o'clock news flash, 'Bis and G Rap
All punch bullets are lookin for them niggas in black
Lean back in the avocado El Dorado, passin the bottle
Speakin Japanese like Nomi Masho
She got a bangin body, cold sushi with warm saki
If I'm rappin sloppy, she got me...

[Kool G Rap]
Welcome to my world, danger and hazards
Gang of bastards, bangin they ratchets
King and the Jacker, slangin in traffic
Claimin they cabbage, obtain half, they aimin for stackage
Get brains from the addict, keep blingin with karats
Cops aiming the 'matics, then let ya dame have it, flames to the attic
The stains on ya fabric, the paint in the graphic
Canibus and G Rap, bangin a classic
And if that beef on the street - hate you enough
Blow out ya brain in ya casket
Don't you love this drug element?
Where slugs crush ya melon and dome
Chrome that's known to break bones in an elephant
Shotgun pellets and, gunsmoke; smell the scent
Big bullets, wiggle ya guts like gelatin
Cut through ya skeleton, knock out ya intelligence
Ride, stand, and bite the dust
Jake wanna be like a Russian cuffed on that Riker bus
We raised in the slums, with haze in our lungs
Raisin the guns, knowin;
My day'll come, razors under the tongue
Clips in the steel, bricks in the wheels
Chips in the field of fortune
Dead men walkin with hits on the grills
Late night at the spot, posted with goons, dope and balloons
Coke and the doom, scheme; I'll leave you open with wounds nigga
Witness G Rap put it back in perspective
Beat up shit with a dash of the peppers
Get blast for ya necklace
Leave ya brains on the dash in ya Lexus
We up in the club, dash for the exit
Make ya spread 'em out - show you what this lead about
Take it from an old thug, whoever clean cold blood
Believe they bled it out (yo)
Crave for the war, pop out rages with fours
Hit the jackpot, blazin the raw - gettin bands in the pores
Bitches and whores with dick in their jaws
The frame drank sick of Valor, straight bandit spot
Open up shop, turn the block to "Planet Rock"
Shit with no chop, slept with the Glock with the hammer cocked
Servin the fiends, hop in the Suburban and lean
Look at that don nigga swervin in Queens, playa
Ballin a lot, brawlin for props, callin the shots
Hit the curb, birds all on the flock
Jockin, like "who that there covered in all of them rocks"
It's royalty bitch, fall on the cock, recognize one
Giacanna G Rap, that live one - pay homage
Get it fucked up, I spray comments, nigga what?!
(Nigga what, it's the Curriculum!)

[Canibus]
Yo, e'rything is e'rything my nigga
I ain't bitter, but if I gave you the finger it'd be behind the trigger
Faggot-ass nigga livin in a gated community
Up in radio, tellin them what you gon' do to me
I live in the 'burbs - clean my Winchester
Every other weekend with the same dirty Hanes shirt
It takes two to tango, three to jump rope
Four to bury the body, plus look out for po'
Yo I guard everything within the limits of my post
My orders is to smoke you if you get to close
The whole globe scared of my flow, spirit world scared of my soul
Nowadays it's like I'm scared to be known
The methods of my motivation is completely subjective
My perception is completely parallel to perspective
Rhyming is the reason I spit in faces
Habituation of my flamboyance without rational reservation
Whiskey, X-Ray, yankee, Zulu, unusual
Word-ologically my syllable position is beautiful
Only respect niggas if the feeling is mutual
G Rap snatch the tools from you, I'll throw 'em in the crucible
Prolly throw you in there too, mix it up and make nigga-stew
If you can't admit I'm iller than you
Baby you sparred with the shadows, Canibus and G Rap yo
Motherfucker professionallin with the pros

[Kool G Rap]
Know it's, dough over hoes - bankrolls, Rovers and clothes
And shots blow all them cowards and foes
Giacanna proud with the pros, foul mode
We quick reachers, spear with the fearless til you drip liters
Flip divas, the big secret, strip to they tits and beaver
Sip Cris' and sniff coke of the peeter
Yeah we ball big baby, look off the meter
You should see us, it's movie star status
Scar lackers lost cabbage, rip the Pablo Escobar fabrics
Froze the road we chose, not a pretty route, Diddied out
Grimey and grittied out, stack dough, jiggy out
Dime bitches behavin like ya sex slave skizzied out
Some nigga dizzy south, til he's out, busy mouth
Swerve to the curb, hit the bird split the kitties out
We kidnap for trap - blackmail for a gang a mill
Spot banger himself, fishscale rocks under the fingernails
The blood trail lead to a corpse
Treat my appetite for greed with a torch
For keys to a Porsche, to breeze in the loft
Roll up my hand sheets with the force
We squeeze off, no need for remorse, playa
Forty wild goons, we forty Calhouns
You die forty foul dooms for forty coward moves
Bless sparkle, and spark until my shorty style rules
Giancanna dead? Widespread, I'll be a 40 mile tune nigga
What, what nigga? The noble laureate
Comin at y'all niggas..
Uh.. 40-pound style nigga...[Verse 4: Canibus]
A scientific division of lyricism
Outside the physical prism we swim in
They misrepresent with negative negligence
I was sent to monitor and develop intelligence
Kabbalah math is all I have
My wife and child were both killed in a helicopter crash
Same old story, chicken noodle was corny
I'm Hip Hop royalty, I wore the flag on me
Four scars, no stars, everybody I know has gone
The ones I still know ain't got no jobs
I joined the army so I could be armed
Do something before they drop a bomb on your lawn
Yeah, it's just a song
A woman gets killed on the way to Wal-Mart but it's just your mom
I smash on a novice, smash on a soft target
Deep underground military base dumb smart bombing
In the crate chamber grand centre, raise your right hand Mister
Tell them you a Ripper, don't whimper
The judge said, "How do you plea?"
I replied, "Innocee, in the Sea of Tranquility"
Cathartic starving artist, God ain't make me no promise
He put me in the pit with the monsters
Half man half lycan, born Titan boar fighting
That's where I swore my rites in
Pirate of the millennium, UAV scours the Caribbean
And tell me where my girlfriend went with him
Transportation provided on the tarmac
Low lighting, de-icing stealth riders on Cyprus
We landed in Atlantis
In the Canibus suite smoking cannabis for the cameras
Panties unseen, G-string extreme
V for the virtuous virgin wearing violin strings
W is just the V and its twin
In God's name who would even think such a thing
Canibus get busy, fuck you!
I've been bleeding red, white and blue since Krush Groove
I instruct you, you may construct for those who trust you
But do not interrupt me in the booth
Send a kite up, Hurricane Germaine bite up
It wake up tied up, face covered with dried blood
Red Leader Viper, clean sweeping for the next fighter
Sci-D enters the cipher[Intro: 'Rocky' sample - Jergens (Rocky)]
Would you be interested in the World Championship? (No)
Listen, you believe that America is the land of opportunity? (Yeah)
Apollo Creed does and he's gonna prove it to the whole world by giving an unknown a shot at the title and that unknown is you
He picked you! It's the chance of a lifetime
You can't pass it by

[Verse 1: Dizaster]
My next King of the Dot battle full of arm grapples, bar shackles
All facts, someone gonna get their top snappled
I bottled it all up, but now you gon' get
Your head cut the fuck off just like Saddam's statue
Army commando armed camel all camo AR ammo
In a standoff with Steven Segal and Rambo
Stick your arm out while I'm standin in vantage point 100 yards out
And I blow your hand off like the jackal
Godfather like I'm Marlon Brando, I'm off the bar handles
Lettin' off the bomb shrapnel inside of the god's chapel
Fuckin' with your seed like Mosanto
Sharper than most large panels, spark candles
For the ones that pass away
I cherish everyday cause life is just a large gamble
This is just the wrong channel, rippin' through your ross flannel
Caught across fire, turn your block into Los Santos
Los Angelos heart bandit with Canibus on the track
Get caught stranded, no navi or the map candid
You catch me whippin' these cats on an ass-whippin' rampage
I'll throw a fast leg like Johnny Cage minus the black shades
Anderson Silva, how I snap legs, yeah

[Interlude: 'Rocky III' sample - Apollo Creed]
Look man, when you beat me, I hurt all over and I didn't wanna know from nothin' or nobody, not even my kids
Hell, every fighter knows that hurt and we get sick inside trying to live with it
So don't back off now and make it right for yourself or you'll be sorry you didn't
We held the greatest title in the whole world
You lost that fight, Rock, for all the wrong reasons
You lost your edge

[Verse 2: Canibus]
King of the Dot muscular dystrophy patients inflicted with
Inflammation barricaded with Oakland Raiders placing wages
Beam him up to my spaceship, where the fuck is your immigration papers? Don't say shit, soak your lips in this basin
You're officially famous, I'm officially off the reservation
I'm officially inviting you to my official engagement
Prophetic, enter the dragon, prosthetic hammers and ratchets
Kalashnikov muzzle flash, brass knuckles crackin'
Double tap, pop you like bubble wrap
You stumble, collapse suffering succotash, you a sucker for rap
Expendable expert commando merc doin' Rambo work
You think cavity search during earthquakes hurt?
I walk with a torn ACL, jump on stage with L
I met Dizaster in the cage by myself
The Don Dada Big Poppa do Krav Maga
The top shaka, shot a Redbull off a pinata
The hurt locker, first name on the roster
Fight you over a dollar, beat the breaks off a Black Friday shopper
Ten million dollar purse, flip a coin, who first?
I'm the referee of this shit, call me Kool Herc
Of the New World Order, New Earth
Choke you with a tire inner tube while American mules drag you through the dirt
Up a hill, down the ravine till the sand wash in my machine
They scratch booty with their hands before they eat
Alphabet savage, count from seven twenty backwards
After three hundred and sixty lashes I don't need no practice
Marketing promotion distribution of plastic, digital tracklist
Hip Hop classic, the whole package
I'm the Sundance Kid and he's Butch, assault and battery
Hot terminology and tenacity
Diz is my battle buddy for life any way
I put Dizaster vs Marshall Mathers any day, say something

[Outro: 'Rocky III' sample - Apollo Creed (Rocky)]
Listen, it's quiet, isn't it? When you retire, it's too quiet
I mean, we way too young to retire, anyway
Besides, with the right touch, I could promote this thing into the biggest gate of all time
It'd be bigger than ours
Heaven knows I don't mind bein involved with large numbers right?
(I don't need this no more, I don't want this no more)[Verse 1: Mr. Cheeks]
Yo, we come through like bulls, nigga take two puffs and pass
Nigga, watch your back once you talk out your ass
I pack a 380 in my stash for protection
Family to raise, the world is acting crazed
I never thought I'd make it, it was hectic when I scrambled
On point like a knife I'm takin' life as a gamble
And living in the rotten apple, yo where every core is rotten
All my niggas rest in peace ya see you gone but not forgotten
Now my main wifey, dead as shaded chicks
Official Lost Boyz since the year of 86
And fuck these crooked niggas I could kill em with a passion
At times I feel like slashing in Jamaican Queens fashion
You think you can fuck around, but kid you're just thinking
It's over when I'm sober, imagine when I'm drinking
Without blinking man, I'll tare your crew like pages
I'll rip you from the backyard park chances stays it

[Verse 2: A+]
A plus the lyrically superb one, spittin rhymes
Off the top of the tongue to burn ya ear drums
Rockin' shit, make the opposite team call a time out
Knockin niggas three times my size out
The crowd loves me, so when I ain't around they ask for me
I buckle up and catch wreck like a crash dummy
For the fast money, I get up in that ass money
The fact you tryin' to test me kinda bugs me
I leave crews fed up, like handicap niggas tryin' to get up
Emcees get wet up with lyrical gun pellets
I blow up the spot when it's time to rock
I speak through a mic my voice peak out at a hundred watts
Who wanna cipha, I get dumb
Word to my mother the father the holy ghost and Rev. Run
When it's all said and done, I end the service
To cop the type of verses that average emcees seem to worship

[Verse 3: Redman]
My style is Milk of Magnesia, clutch the 5-speed and bust
The more the merrier, secure the area, my La Familia
Is ultimate superior we dont jack cars
We jack for aircraft carriers
I bounce like trampolines, when I be blowing the fiends to pieces
Hymn em like sewing machines and Jesus
When the shadows of the barrel pointing out my boy Camaro
I get punished like pharaoh for splittin'
You're better off singing Christmas carols for Christmas
Because I'm on point like bow and arrow equipment
The president of chicken head conventions
I give you a deluxe Ku Klux lynchin'
I got a headache from the stress, success not wearing a vest
5-11 for being dirty and quarts of 9-30
Yo, Mr.Cheeks, I made this bitch call police
She tried swallowing a nine piece
Forgot the warrantee on false teeth
I return like Makaveli on 18 inch Pirelli's
Assault and battery like my palms was ever ready
Sharp as machete's, matter of fact I slap for cognac

[Verse 4: Canibus]
Canibus brings the sickest drama, fierce enough to pierce the thickest armor
I smack bitches who try to suck dick through a condom
Playing with the mic is something I won't do
My only concern when I approach you, is to roast you
I smoke you and whoever you standing close to
And make every man in your crew deny that he knows you
Defeating, niggas like Seagal Steven
Putting MCs in positions to prevent 'em from breathing
I'll make you question any and everything you've ever believed in
By peeping your deepest secrets like psychic readers
What's the matter with y'all, I splatter y'all
Against the motherfucking wall with these raw lyrics I catapult
None of y'all got the balls big enough to battle
I go On & On like Erika Badu
A hundred times nicer than the best is
Twice as arrogant as KRS is, who wanna test this?
Fuck y'all, you don't impress me and no one can test me
An MC so ill, I got AIDS scared to catch me
All that shit you popping will stop, when I put you in a headlock
And apply pressure until I crush your motherfucking noggin
I grab mics and push niggas to the left
So fast their hearts end up on the right side of their chests
My hypothesis, is that nobody can see this
Lyrical genius, I got it sown like a seamstress
But if you want to battle, I'm down
If you got nine lives, I'll take eight of them off your hands right now
Step up and get your neck cut from ear to ear
If you survive, then you can cover your scar with a beard
I'm the illest from Queens to the new Jerusalem briddicks
Anyone who ain't feeling my shidick can suck my didick
You need to quit it, if you ain't spitting
More than 50 bars per minute cause you ain't in lyrical fitness
Kicking boring raps with metaphors that's wack
All of y'all motherfuckers need NordicTrack
To get ya weight up, fucking with Canibus you get ate up
Get beat down and sprayed up, just for bringing my name up
Been rocking longer than niggas twice my age
Back in the days before Bob
Marley was rocking a fade
Before Honest Abe signed the paper that freed slaves
Before Neanderthals was drawing on walls in caves
I existed, in the garden of Eden getting lifted
Sticking dick to Eve before she was Adams mistress
Before Christ created Christmas, I been in lyrical fitness
The Canibus is spitting till he's spitless
50 bars of total sickness, you won't forget this
I'm putting every wack Emcee alive on my shit list
Verbally vicious, telekinetically gifted
Took you a minute, to exhibit that I'm sick wit it
Now you tell me who you think is damaging shit
Going once, going twice
Sold to that nigga name Canibus
Me and Mr.Cheeks, A+, and Funk Doctor
Hopping out the Hue helicopter to suey chop ya[Intro: Canibus]
Behind enemy rhymes, when the curriculum storms
Behind enemy rhymes, when the curriculum storms
It's like this yo, check it out, uh, yo

[Verse 1: Canibus]
When the curriculum storms
Modern rap history is reborn on CD code in the form of a poem
Anyone that studies Canibus' past knows he has the answers
To questions you're probably not advanced enough to ask
Super advanced faculty man, chairman of curriculum class
85% never pass, 10% smile and 5% don't even laugh
When the chalks in my hand and I'm drawing up graphs
I present the contingency plan to the top brass
They probably think I'm on speed I'm talking so fast
The body of the rhyme is smooth like body and bath
The summary is more explosive than a meth lab blast
My symmetrical shockwave shatter glasses
My U-235 rhyme hits critical mass
Apocalypse Now, lyrical raps blow everything off the map
From green grass to African Baobabs
Spike with an electro-mag, aircrafts crash
CDC's in the streets passing out gas masks
Gorgeous women thank me for the oxygen tank
Baby, the chevrons on my arm will tell you my rank
Maybe I'll become another casualty in the field
They'll engrave my tombstone with the master steel
The best beats in the world couldn't rival my skill
That's like throwing a cup of water on a million beached whales
Ran eloquence on an unprecedented scale
Close your eyes, feel the rhymes cause I'm better in Braille
The Francis Bacon basics, I should reiterate this
We rise to great heights by winding staircases
The line spiral in a French curve design
When the curriculum storms, Behind enemy rhymes

[Chorus: Canibus]
When the curriculum storms, this is lyrical law
Computer programmed bars come out of digital jaws
This is the toughest course in hip hop so far
Behind enemy rhymes, when the curriculum storms, (x2)

[Verse 2: Canibus]
Written addendum, curriculum - attention deficit disorder
Magician flipping them with serotonin re-uptake inhibitors
That inhibit them from the seeing the vision when
They spit against Bis and them they must want to get dissed again
I'm sicker than your sixth sense inhale breaths
Through the luffa in my chest bigger than wind tunnel vents
Please believe the ammo is live
My fusillade of rhymes fly through your ride and go stream fuselage
Blistering speed fools eyes with fast rhymes
Setting world records for Nuremberg rings' fastest lap times
Get chequered flags for 48 tracks of rhymes
A hundred times for vocal signatures too complex to sign
Human by design, a mental monster of the mind
Rhetoric versus reality the reason I rhyme
Eternally inclined to shine
Principles a plenitude, I spit at you, injure you if you step out of line
A transcendental intellectual
A marvel to the medical professionals that claim they half wanna test a dude
Before they understand what I'm equipped to do
Visual psychoanalytical living proof that I rip you
I rip the roof off like cyclones do
When the curriculum storms I rip a microphone too
A molecular miracle in the physical
My lyrical has always been something different for you to listen to
Difficult but legible, forever memorable
Enough to remain in the membrane of your mental pool
I train your brain muscles and take you to school
Hard rocks become gentle jewels, these are the rules
When you in the Mic Club mood you never get booed
Aptitude and attitude are your battling tools
Stay calm and spit those bars
If you find yourself behind enemy rhymes you got to weather the storm

Chorus 2x[Rip]
Yo, you fucking hate me, you fucking lock me in the basement
And you still want me to protect you, it doesn't make sense
Can-I-Bitch, I supported you like a weight bench
Without me you're defenceless you better face it
You ain't show me love when you was at your apex
Getting paychecks up at the radio with DMX and Flex
Catching wreck while Noreaga was catching his breath
I had to keep the situation in check
Look at the varicose veins in my neck, Germaine is the best
The industry fucked you, I'm just paying 'em back
What's the matter with slaying jackers? That's all I've been doing
Besides talking shit I ain't done nothing to 'em
They just mad cause when I see 'em I don't run up to 'em
Between me and you, yo you know I run right through 'em

[Bis]
Calm down

[Rip]
Who you telling to calm down nigga, I'm a ripper remember?
I told you not to do "Gone Til November."
But you wouldn't listen. I always had your best interests in mind
I wrote all your best lyrical lines
If it wasn't for me you'd be writing pitiful lines
On stage if you was tired, I was spitting sometimes
Nobody knew you bit off my rhymes
I would just be quiet, stand to the side and let that shit ride
But I'm getting tired of having to remind you Bis
If it wasn't for me nobody would've signed you Bis

[Bis]
What?! Man, why you tripping, you know it's a crazy business
You a lying ass bitch and you know it
Group Home was part my company, I co-owned it
If its one thing I learned in show biz
Stay focused and don't quit Rip
Why you talking 'bout old shit?

[Rip]
Germaine, you fucking water brain
Don't you understand, fuck the mainstream
You should just call out names
The industry's all about game I shit on 'em all the same and I leave spit stains on their brain
Like liquid chocolate spilling over their new white trainers
Insane is an understatement, I'm Satan
Canibus is amazing, I don't know what the fuck Germain is
I just know that both of y'all are trying my patience
I don't give a fuck about a beat, I've been rhyming for ages
Rippers are dangerous, all jackers are afraid of us
You wanna face me Bis? Kick a rhyme!
(That's ridiculous), aight then, listen to mine
I jump in a costume impromptu just to rob you
Put the nozzle to your eye ball and tell you what not to do
Rip your tonsils out through your nostrils
Bury you next to shark fossils
Make it impossible to find you
Depths that Jacques Cousteau himself wouldn't dare to dive to
With goggles, oxygen bottles and Doppler effect modules
Lock you in a time capsule, smash the console
Shit on you in reverse and suck you in a brown hole
Suck the power out of your soul
You're nothing but a coward in the cold freezer with a hour to go
Watching my Casio stop watch, counting it slow
Like drug lords checking to see if it's talcum or coke
I can kill you by drowning the globe
Or I can just spit inside of a hole and put an ounce in your throat
In battles I'm a thousand & 0, I silenced the Pope
Do you know how many rhymes I've economically grossed?
No? I thought so
Neither do I
Its a dick between your mother's thighs divided by pi
I'm the sickest linguistically, illicit lyrical misfit, in the business
And probably in existence. What's your consensus?
Study my own syntax statistics since '96
With CPA certified assistance
I made a decision that my standards are above precision
The only thing I can honestly say I love more than women are dope writtens
If it ain't dope then don't spit it
Don't be sensitive and get on the defensive
Just practice your penmanship
If you can't spit at high temperatures then just quit
Be careful of the tongue it tends to bend to the left
According to manufacture's specs you'll make a mess
And rupture the blood vessels in your neck fucking with Rip
Got millions of blueprints on zip disk
Stock versions of sick verses that come with conversion kits
With a course every Thursday that teaches you how to burst like Rip
You never experienced work like this, Bitch!
Welcome to the serpentine world where I spit
The world where I twist, the world that I rip, the world where I live

[Bis]
Okay Rip you made your point, I can't out-rap you
You said you was the illest, I would never doubt that too
A lot of these rappers is jealous that's why they attack you
They think you the best, that's why they wanna battle you
At the moment of truth I let you design the tattoos
You are the illest alive. That's a fact that you proved
Just a couple rappers don't want it to happen for you
Ragging on you like battling is all you can do
You didn't sell enough units to be honest with you
Nobody knows the truth, you got talent out the gazoo
When niggas first heard you it was like "Man on the Moon"
You got dissed by a legend but you damaged him too
So what if the ladies think he's more handsome than you
What happens if the rumours about being a faggot are true?
Look what it's running into
I don't feel like having this discussion with you
I'm tired of fucking with you
Niggas in the game don't wanna do nothing with you
Bussing with you. Going one on one with who?
They wanna get rid of you. Shit is too lyrical
Headhunters out to get you. That's why I had to protect you
I wouldn't disrespect you as another intellectual
Without you I'm unsuccessful
God bless you
What makes you think I left you or why I'd ever be tempted to?
Ever since my third album I've been mentioning you
I got your name on my arm, I'm representing you
You Rip the Jacker. I would never question you
I respect your opinion as a professional nigga
I just want you to listen to what I'm telling you
What happened between L and you, forget it
People know you won the battle, they will give you the credit
A lot of people don't want to admit it
But I consider it a real privilege to bear witness to your lyrics
And be involved in sharing the merits, I'm forever indebted
I just need you to chill for a second
So I can send a positive message
Like 2Pac before he left us
The author of the work ethic Genesis
Has inspired me to write the ExeBis scripts
As a constant reminder not to forget Bis
But I've reached a precipice
Remember Rip
You can't rhyme forever, there's always somebody with better shit
I keep you out the public eye for a reason
You're a commodity Rip, ain't that how you wanna keep it?
I keep your whereabouts secret
I bring bitches to the crib every weekend so why is you beefing?

[Rip]
Aiyo, stop patronizing me, you despise me
All you wanna do is steal rhymes from me
You constantly keep me behind walls of concrete
Lock me in the basement like a fucking zombie
If I was a priority, you'd acknowledge me
You ain't shit neither, you ain't got no college degree
You can't rhyme without me, stop smiling at me
Give me the keys to the garage, I need to borrow the Jeep
Get the fuck out my face, Bis[Verse 2: Canibus]
I choke ghosts from my past with a rope made of ether 9 gas
Then I let the evil times pass
It's clear and only natural that niggas come at you to trap you
But they will put your assassin in shackles
If you seek revenge, dig many graves
Cause you will be betrayed a different number of ways
Many days are spent plotting and planning your revenge
But let me tell you how it's gonna end, son
Cold and lonely, dying slowly
Listening to oldies but ain't got no homies
Predatorial instincts, territorial animalistics
Some spirits are dark and twisted
We all rise and decline above or below that line
And continue to either climb or dive
Killer bee collective mind back at the hive
Sting you a million times just for acting all shy
Get booted up, move up, for losing Sharpshooter
Cougars chasing pumas, justice is juicing guts
The mortars shell loosen you up, you so stiff you stuck
Shut the... before I put you in the trunk
Fifty minutes of funk, I lock, load and dunk
Get some, that's how you get revenge you little punk
But revenge is not what Canibus want
Canibus love Hip Hop, Canibus is done[Intro: Killah Priest]
Yea, yea, yea, yea
Yea, yea - fuck that!
I'm set it off - yea, yea, ya shitted
Ya in some shit now, son
It's on now, motherfuckers can suck my dick
I'm back! Fuck that shit!
Ready to eat niggas up, beat they ass and e'rything, son
I'mma prove this shit, right here
Me and my nigga - what!?

[Killah Priest]
The emperor, chief sinister, street minister
Guarenteed in two bars to finish ya
React like a cat when he arches back
Give a fake rapper a heart attack, once I start to rap
I'm a vocalist, nigga, supposed to rip
Last Poet's told me this, hit ya in ya head wit my explosive fist
Then I finish ya off with my tremendous horse-kick
What now, nigga? Look at ya, talk shit
Can't do it, cuz you ain't got no teeth in ya mouth
And I know ya just tired of me, beatin ya out
Ya trained all year, in a karate class
It took one second, to put yo' ass in a body bag
From a shotty blast, I walk up in ya club and ya parties don't last
I like to pop shit, don't get me started
I slap y'all motherfuckers like y'all little kids in kindergarten
Squeeze yo' head till yo' kidneys harden
Now watch this, I'mma call my whole motherfuckin squadron
And tell niggas to just start robbin
Cuz y'all niggas is fucked up
And Brooklyn niggas is really ready to get ya
I know how to hit ya, and cut ya open
But don't worry, cuz I'mma stitch ya, with a rusty screwdriver

[Hook: Killah Priest]
Niggas bop yo' heads to this, real shit
Call up yo' clicks to this, it's realness
You feel this in yo' streets and village
Spare that new shit, Priest killed it
Y! Niggas bop yo' heads to this, real shit
Call up yo' clicks to this, it's realness
You feel this in yo' streets and village
Spare that new shit, 'bus killed it

[Canibus]
Yo, yo, yo
Yo I'm a Macabeast MC and I possess the ability
To run at top speed without bendin my knees
I destory shit, pin-point asteroids in orbit
Then, hurl niggas thousands of miles an hour, towards it
Fuckin heathen, wrap my hands around ya neck region
Then I start squeezin 'til ya stop breathin
You weaklins is playin tug-of-war wit ya tongues
I knock the teeth out ya gums and suck the breeze out ya lungs
Hit ya wit a blow your physical frame could never sustain
You'll probably never walk ever again
Nigga, you think you rhyme sick? I leave you lyin stiff
Put you in a horsemen heimlich til I break ya spine, bitch
Stop cryin bitch, before I hit ya wit the Iron, bitch
You can't rhyme bitch, the one triple nine's mine bitch
The pain'll make ya voice change octaves
From low-pitched to high-pitched, every hour we kill a hostage
We judge MC's by they lyrical fitness
And punish DJ's for puttin corny stickers on they mixes
Smack the stripper bitches for askin for our autograph and pictures
You'll be scared to leave the club wit us
You scratch my back, I'll scratch your's bitch
I'll eat ya salt-fish, if ya suck my sausage
I got an atomic sub, armed wit a sub-atomic scud
Ready to spill ya crimson-colored blood
The four horsemen on the back of four quadripeds
Puttin four hoof prints on ya foreheads, motherfuckers!
(There it is!) So bop ya heads to that, uh (There it is!)

[Hook]

[Outro: Killah Priest]
Fuckin pussy emcee's, gon' get a shot in the eye
Y'all niggas talk behind nigga's backs
Y'all niggas better bop ya mothafuckin heads before we blow it off
Ya fuckin perfume missin idiots
Y'all niggas always runnin, go run and tell that
Go on, runnin, run behind somebody's back
Run and tell that and take these fuckin slugs wit ya
We gon' get ya mothafuckin clown
Yea...[Canibus]
Record industry's most wanted, Rip the Jacker
Wanted for the '98 slayings of several rappers
One of which went on to be a successful actor
Here's the reenactment, he called me at my mansion
But the phone probably rang two times, then I answered
He sounded really amped up, he tried to scare me
He told me that Def Jam wanted to ban me
And told me Tracy Wabels{?} wanted to bang me
Damn I wanted to get in her panties, she was scared of me
Canibus hates the media and the magazines
They add so much credibility to elaborate schemes
Internet chatrooms with live feeds of a rapper
Bein eaten alive by live bees
Sound barriers like the Lockheed, even with knock knees
I run across rough terrain at mach speed
That's a rhyme from like 9-3, it's vivid in the mind
As pictures with six hundred DPI's to a sheet
If I'm high when I speak, the knowledge is deep, solid as concrete
This is real hip-hop for the streets
I never leave any witnesses, it's ridiculous
They serve me court papers at the studio I did this in
Missin from society, because they lied to me
They didn't want to accept my doctrine of society
I've studied with hundreds of scientists and science teams
In various Ivy Leagues, they respect my esteem
Whattayou want me to rap about? Go 'head, try a theme
Give me a person place or thing, I'll create the time and scene
Somewhere in Afghanistan, U.S.A. survival teams
Keep an eye on their surroundings in the jihad regime
A total riot scene, back and forth
They encrypt fiber optic beams on my album out next spring
You motherfuckin right nigga, I'm about that cream
I promised myself I wouldn't shoot it without that scene
It doesn't look right like Cash Money without that bling
Siblings, I mean we all got the same last name
Jermaine, Williams, that's my name
Say it again, Jermaine Williams, dang!
I think he goes by the name of the Canibus man
And occasionally Rip the Jacker, but never Stan
Get it through your head and don't ask me again
Box cutta', bladerunna', nigga rap 'til you sweat
Have you ever read a book called "The Catcher in the Rye"
It so happens I'm lookin for a copy I can buy
Canibus is comin for y'all 'round the outside
'Round the outside, 'round the outside
A lot of y'all shine, but y'all can't rhyme
And it's about time that I put y'all in line
Twist your mind, with twisted rhymes
As weird as Michael Jackson's nose from the side
Flows that abide are quite bold for the times
No need to hide, your friends are associates of mine
Don't be a stranger, come over some time
I got coke if you do lines, you get a robe at the drive
If you hear the engine knockin just pull over to the side
I guess it hasn't been serviced in all this time
Halloween, "True Hollywood Stories" release date
We should have a "Who Wants to Battle Canibus" sweepstakes
And limit it to three states, New York City, home of the greats
Philly and out West, piece of cake
Old school rappers I wouldn't be around without
Ain't got shit to say but keep puttin albums out
Don't let what I said, get you upset
Box cutta', bladerunna', nigga rap 'til you sweat{*helicopter flying, pilot talking*}

Record industry's most wanted: "Rip the Jacker"
Wanted for the '98 slayings of several rappers
One of which went on to be a successful actor
Here's the re-enactment: He called me at my man's crib
The phone probably rang two times, then I answered
He sounded really amped up, he tried to scare me
He told me that Def Jam wanted to ban me
And told me Tracey Waples wanted to bang me
Damn I wanted to get in her panties, she was scared of me
Canibus hates the media and the magazines
They add so much credibility to elaborate schemes
Internet chatrooms with live feeds
Of a rapper bein eatin alive by live bees
Sound barriers like the Lockheed, even with knock-knees
I run across rough terrain at mach speed
That's a rhyme from like 9-3
As vivid in the mind, as pictures with 600 DPI's to a sheet
If I'm high when I speak, the knowledge is deep
Solid as concrete, this is real hip-hop for the streets
I never leave any witnesses, it's ridiculous
They served me court papers in the studio I did this in
Missin from society, because they lied to me
They didn't want to accept my doctrine of society
I studied with hundreds of scientists and science teams
At various Ivy Leagues, they respect my esteem
What do you want me to rap about? Go ahead try a theme
Gimme a person, place, or thing - I'll create the time and scene
Somewhere in Afghanistan, U.S.A survival teams
Keep a eye on their surroundings in the Jihad Regime
A total riot scene, back and forth they encrypt fiber optic beams
On my album out next spring
You motherfuckin right nigga I'm about that cream
I promised my self I wouldn't shoot it without that scene
It doesn't look right like Cash Money without that bling
Siblings, I mean we all got the same last name
Jermaine Williams, that's my name
Say it again Jermaine Williams, danggg
I think he goes by the name of the Canibus Man
And occasionally Rip the Jacker but never Stan
Get it through your head and don't ask me again
Box cutter, blade runner nigga rap 'til you sweat
Have you ever read the book called "The Catcher in The Rye"?
It so happens I'm looking for a copy I could buy
Canibus is comin for y'all round the outside
Round the outside, round the outside
A lotta y'all shine, but y'all can't rhyme
And it's about time that I put y'all in line
Twist your mind with twisted rhymes
As weird as Michael Jackson's nose from the side
Flows that'll buy the quite bow for the times
No need to hide your friends are all associates of mine
Dont be a stranger come over some time
I got coke if you do lines, you get a Rover to drive
If you hear the engine knockin, just pull over to the side
I guess it hasn't been serviced in all this time
Halloween: True Hollywood Stories release date
We should have a "Who Wants to Battle Canibus?" sweepstakes
And limit it to three states; New York City: home of the greats
Philly and out West, piece-a-cake
Old school rappers, I wouldn't be around without
Ain't got shit to say but keep puttin' albums out
Don't let what I said get you upset
Box cutter, blade runner nigga rap 'til you sweat...[Mr. Cheeks]
Basically, LB Fam to the motherfuckin death
Park side, Queen's niggas represent
Long Isle, how we do? They new our style
Represent niggas in and out the P now
Yo, I could do this mother shit for a while
I don't give a fuck, my rap style be true yo
Yo, eh yo, yo, yo, how we do this

Hey yo well back on my South Side, Jamaica part of town
Where us real niggas love to get down
Where you only hear G and P finessin tracks up on the tape
We stuck in Queens and I'm not tryin to escape
Yo Im havin cess', drinkin, I'm kickin raps and Emceein
LB for life, kid my way of bein
Its time to, set up shops, wild in this game and got props
And fuck cops, we puffin lah wit windows up in drop tops
Nothin stops my crew from gettin it we learn from the past
Puffin on this ounce of weed, I got this drink in my glass
Conversatin with myself, what does my future hold?
Niggas is dyin, will I make it past 30 years old?
I can't run, I guess I gots to hold it down till I'm done
What the fuck's the deal? I been doin this here from day one
Official Queen's nigga, be a Lost Boy till my death
Until I breathe my mothafuckin last breath

Chorus: Mr. Cheeks {2X}

Eh yo from boyz to men
We're strictly Fam, no longer friends
Lets keep it thorough, I hold it down till its on again
Until we meet again, yo I'm back up on the street again
I'm tryin to make it, throw out my nine but pack the heat again

[A+]
Check this out
Yo, yo
My mind is reachin twice that size than it only did last year
Three times its likely to feel clear
A+, I transform into a super emcee
With super vocals quicker than Superman can find a phone booth
The whole truth nothin but the whole truth, I roast you
Thermonuclear vocals be hotter than Chernobyl
The double O whatever (as in 007) soldier, survive nuclear explosions
Exposin radiation like a vulcan
I'm the only guy that knows why the golden eye
Was stolen by five soviet spies
They told me to lie, they dont want to hear the god spit
Chop my hands off at the armpits but I regenerate limbs
Like Star fish, comin at you with the hard shit
Swallow my beeper and page myself so I can communicate with a dolphin
Lyrical arson rush the planet like a million martians committin arson
Walkin the tarpits in India with snake charmers that place all the weight
Down...

[Canibus]
Yo A+ fuck the nonsense
I got the reinforcements
To crush any enemies offense with a hundred thousand Horsemen
And the hardest muthafucka on the market right here
I'll complete in a minute what would take you a light year
Extra-terrestrial biological entities with infinite energy
Battling for world supremecy
Who wanna get touched
The CAN-I-BUS will crush you
With hard jigsaw puzzles and strong jaw muscles
Ambushin emcees jumpin out the trees
Like Vietnamese in fatigues covered with leaves
Interrogatin you wack emcees like MIB's with dark glasses
Askin you to tell me exactly where that alien craft landed
By flashing bright light in your eyes with those silver gamas
So when you revive you can't recall or understand it
Thats how the Canibus keeps tabs on the planet
I use amnesia to neutralize public panic
And take advantage of oppurtinites to do damage
I pierce your heart with evil thoughts
The only thing faster then tha speed of light is the speed of dark
With the jaws of a great white shark I rip you apart
My state-of-the art lyrical lasers is razor sharp
Splatter the brain matter of my enemies
With the same bullet trajectory that murdered John Kennedy
In the back of his cranial cavity which is actually
What happens to any motherfucker for tryin to battle me

Chorus {2X}